CSO 

<F P=106> [Book by N.I. Krotov and A.A. Tsyganov Voyennyye </F>
Rossii (Military Figures of Russia) from the series 
Kto yest kto? Sorok sorokov (Who Is Who? 40x40), 
Moscow, Izdatelstvo RAU-Press, 1992, 2000 copies, 132 pages] 
  [Text] 
<H5>  Preface </H5>
  I once had occasion to hear the usual, grumbling squabble of 
two old women, contemporaries of Soviet power. It was about some 
everyday matters, about a faucet that was not working, about a 
torn up country road... But one sentence struck me: "No matter 
what you want, during peacetime the rural soviet did nothing..." 
  Peacetime! 
  Does that mean that these old Russian women, who have seen 
much, equate today to wartime?.. 
  On the other hand, why wouldn't they? Throughout the remote 
parts of the country that have become independent, real blood is 
being shed. Army units have found themselves in a real ambush in 
many places. Bursts of automatic weapons are heard on streets 
that just recently were peaceful. 
  Is today peacetime? It can be argued that it is wartime. But 
the fact that people in the military have begun to play a far 
more noticeable role today--in politics, parliaments, and power 
structures--is a noteworthy characteristic of our days. Some of 
them were drawn into politics--as such a powerful force as the 
army could not help but be drawn into politics. Some broke into 
politics in an attempt to make a reality of their own ideas and 
notions about the country's future. Some came, having been 
elected to bodies of power, and found their path here. And some 
simply were continuing to serve, but it was here at their duty 
station that they became well known. 
  Well-known military leaders of Russia is the subject of this 
book, the first in the "40 x 40" series devoted to all those 
whose names are in the newspaper, who influence the lives and 
destinies of millions, and who to their own degree form reality. 
  Alksnis and Yazov, Lopatin and Grachev, Lebed and Kasatonov, 
these names one way or another will remain in the history of 
recent years. But who are these people? How did they grow up, 
where did they serve, what do they believe in, and what do they 
hope for? Few know these things. 
  We have tried to fill this gap. The basis for this book was 
information gathered over recent years by the Dossier Service of 
the Aleksandr Information and Publishing Firm and the Institute 
of Mass Political Movements of the RAU-Press Agency. These data 
were collected from various sources: from the press, from 
comments and recollections of colleagues, and from statements of 
the heroes of this book themselves. The authors of the book 
wanted to depart from rigid biographical outlines given in 
various reference books. This book attempts to fill the classic 
principle of "who is who" with some living portrait traits, 
comments of knowledgeable people, and little-known details 
giving a picture of the people being described here. 
  For events are not simply actions. They are also characters. 
  In the series "40 x 40", we plan to tell, of course, not 
only 
about "who is who" among today's officers and generals. 
Materials are being prepared for the same type of book on 
politicians; there are plans to publish the biographies of 
well-known entrepreneurs, church figures, and leaders of parties 
and national movements. And every time this will be 40 of the 
most well-known people in their field, real "players." The "40 x 
40" concept belongs to Russia, but we plan to talk not only 
about Russians but also well-known figures of other republics of 
the former USSR, both present and past. 
  These publications may be ordered in advance, and the 
address 
for accepting orders can be found in the back of this book. We 
will also be happy to hear your suggestions and remarks. 
  We wish you the very best! 
  The Authors 
<H5>  Anatoliy Alekseyevich Alekseyev </H5>
  This person can justifiably be called both an antipode and 
the double of the Chairman of the Movement for Social Protection 
of Servicemen "Shchit," Vitaliy Urazhtsev. Even their work was 
similar--after Captain 1st Rank Anatoliy Alekseyev was appointed 
chairman of the Committee for Affairs of Servicemen and Their 
Family Members under the president of the USSR in September 
1991. In essence, he became a lucky competitor of the founders 
of the independent movement for social protection "Shchit"--at 
least luckily receiving such a reliable presidential "cover." 
  Anatoliy Alekseyev was born in Pskov Oblast on 1 January 
1950. He graduated from the Leningrad Higher Naval Engineering 
School imeni F.E. Dzerzhinskiy in 1972. He served in the Pacific 
Fleet 12 years. In 1984, he was transferred to Kronstadt as an 
instructor of Navy technicians, where in 1990 he was elected as 
a people's deputy of Russia. He worked as chairman of a 
commission of the RSFSR Supreme Soviet investigating the deaths 
and injuries of servicemen and military construction workers and 
protecting their legal rights and interests. He was a captain 3d 
rank. 
  In September 1991, he (and also V. Lopatin, a well-known 
military reformer, and Alekseyev's deputy, Leonid Glushchak) "as 
an exception" was promoted a grade for services in defense of 
the "White House." This took place, however, without the 
necessary command recommendations. There were only two 
applications. Glushchak asked for a commendation for Alekseyev, 
and Alekseyev asked for one for Glushchak. 
  In March 1992, the general procurator of Russia, Valentin 
Stepankov, protested these orders as issued "with violations of 
the requirements of existing legislation" and demanded that they 
be rescinded. 
  In early May 1992, the commander in chief of the Combined 
Armed Forces of the CIS, Marshal of Aviation Yevgeniy 
Shaposhnikov, rescinded his orders. And A. Alekseyev ceased 
being a captain 1st rank, and L. Glushchak ceased being a 
colonel of justice (NEZAVISIMAYA GAZETA 7 May 92, KRASNAYA 
ZVEZDA 6 May 92). 
  The political career of A. Alekseyev was seriously 
complicated by the position of the Movement of Soldiers' 
Mothers, which more than once demanded Alekseyev's resignation 
and even organized a hunger strike at the RSFSR Supreme Soviet 
building in order to achieve this resignation. True, among those 
close to this circle of specialists there exists the conviction 
that Urazhtsev, the leader of "Shchit," was behind this 
demand... True or not, USSR President M.S. Gorbachev, "taking 
into account the appeal of the congress of the `Soldiers' 
Mothers of Russia' movement and the opinion of servicemen's 
parents," decreed "to declare it inadvisable for candidates for 
the position of chairman of the Committee for Affairs of 
Servicemen and Their Family Members under the USSR president to 
be seen as interested in public associations" (that is, to all 
intents and purposes, `Shchit,' as number one on this list) and 
suspended the powers of committee chairman Alekseyev. 
  At the Second Extraordinary Congress of the All-Union 
Council 
of Parents of Servicemen, convened at the initiative of the USSR 
president in order "once and for all to unite all movements of 
soldiers' parents and develop a common program of actions." 
Anatoliy Alekseyev, already chairman of the All-Union Council of 
Servicemen's Parents, offered to remove from the meeting the 
leader of "Shchit," his colleague in the Russian Parliament, 
RSFSR People's Deputy Vitaliy Urazhtsev... 
  Russian President Boris Yeltsin settled the dispute, 
abolishing Alekseyev's committee on 6 May 1992, which by that 
time had become a Russian committee, and decreed to create a 
corresponding new committee in Russia's Ministry of Defense 
(without Alekseyev). 
  Alekseyev believes that "Commander-in-Chief Shaposhnikov 
exerted every effort to remove the committee." "When the 
committee was created, Shaposhnikov jokingly said: If such a 
committee will be created and is headed by Alekseyev, who will 
control me, I will put in for retirement" (NEZAVISIMAYA GAZETA 
15 May 92). 
  Alekseyev ended up in "retirement" first. "But we will not 
give up," stated the chairman of the abolished committee. "As 
long as I am chairman of the Council of CIS Servicemen's 
Parents, I will fight negative phenomena in the Army." 
  Soldiers' Mothers and members of the Council of CIS 
Servicemen's Parents told of the support given them by the 
committee--an outlet for parents, and the chairman personally 
and solemnly promised to help defend the committee, for which 
"they will do everything." All the more so because the council 
is already receiving letters with threats of self-immolation if 
the president does not repeal his decree (NEZAVISIMAYA GAZETA 15 
May 92). 
<H5>  Viktor Imantovich Alksnis </H5>
  Perhaps few officers have played such a significant role in 
politics of recent years. Few could like USSR People's Deputy 
Colonel Viktor Alksnis, almost a symbolic figure for the entire 
ideological trend. As a result, few have been attacked so 
harshly by political opponents as he. Except for his antithesis, 
although representing the other flank, and also a symbol--Telman 
Gdlyan. 
  Viktor Imantovich Alksnis is Latvian, but was born in 
Siberia 
in 1950. His grandfather, Yakov Ivanovich Alksnis, a party 
member since 1916 and a Red division commissar during the Civil 
War, served up to 1931 to the post of chief of the Red Army Air 
Force. Like many military leaders of his rank, he was repressed 
and executed in 1938. A little earlier, this inhabitant of flat 
No. 100 in the "House on the Quay" himself, as a member of a 
special military presence, had participated in the trial of his 
friend Marshal Tukhachevskiy. A transcript of this case was 
confiscated from him during the arrest. In the words of family 
members, in his final months of his freedom Ya.I. Alksnis did 
not give up on it, trying to understand how such a thing could 
have happened. 
  After Khrushchev's rehabilitation of the victims of 
Stalinism, the family of Viktor Alksnis returned home to Riga in 
1957. 
  Alksnis tells little about his childhood, but it is known 
that it was similar to the childhood of almost all offspring of 
new Bolshevik families--it is unimportant from one or another 
side of the rifle sight or camp barbed wire: With the spark of 
his grandfather's glory, with the quiet whisper behind the back, 
and with archives and memoirs of relatives who told something 
different than the textbooks. And with attempts at comprehending 
what has taken place... 
  Viktor Alksnis followed the military path of his ancestor. 
He 
graduated from the Riga Higher Military Aviation Engineering 
School imeni... It is appropriate to interrupt here, for the 
future military engineer each day passed by a plaque bearing the 
name of his rehabilitated Ya.I. Alksnis. 
  His military occupational specialty was radio engineer. In 
the last years before the stormy start of his political career, 
he serviced MiG-29 aircraft. He served in the Baltic Military 
District: He was a senior engineer-inspector of a military unit 
in Riga. 
  On the wave of Gorbachev's perestroyka, Viktor Imantovich 
Alksnis was drawn into politics. In 1989 he became a USSR 
people's deputy and participated in the work of the first 
congress of deputies. At that time and later, he made the 
following statements: 
  "Today we all--communists, social democrats, constitutional 
democrats, monarchists--are citizens of a great country. It is 
our duty to preserve this country and pass it on to our children 
and grandchildren... Destruction of the USSR will bring a 
terrible threat to every family, every person. Collapse of the 
USSR is a threat to the whole world." 
  "I am a communist, but long ago I favored a multiparty 
system. I consider this to be a sign of a rule-of-law state." 
  Observers consider 16 November 1990 to be the peak of his 
career, when at a session of the USSR Supreme Soviet he gave the 
president an ultimatum to put order in the country within 30 
days. 
  It was at this time, in the words of Alksnis, that M. 
Gorbachev authorized the KGB to tap his telephone (at the Moscow 
Hotel). Excerpts from the transcript of the tap were 
systematically reported to Gorbachev, and he even made notes on 
them. All materials were stored in the safe of Valeriy Boldin, 
former director of the USSR President's staff, who was arrested 
under the case of the State Committee for the State of Emergency 
[GKChP]. The materials were confiscated by the Russian 
Procurator's Office. 
  According to his political views, Alksnis sided with the 
communists, whose main goal was to preserve the USSR namely as a 
union of Soviet and socialist republics. Alksnis instantly 
distanced himself from the increasingly radical positions of his 
Latvian colleagues and somehow imperceptibly fell from the 
political palette of his republic. Therefore, few were surprised 
when in 1991 he became co-chairman of the deputy group 
"Soyuz"--the same group that most consistently expressed the 
power-communist views of advocates of the USSR. And in 
accordance with the logic of political struggle, Alksnis 
actively opposed any impulses to revise the country's 
nation-state system: "What is to be done with the signing of the 
Union Treaty? It will not be signed at all. This is a tale for 
small children... The treaty will not work, just as the ideas of 
republic cost-accounting, constitutional oversight, the 
presidency..." 
  Under the ever-increasing polarization of public life 
between 
democracy, recognizing the right of nations to 
self-determination, and communism--having begun to seize 
positions in national movements, but officially advocating a 
unified USSR, Alksnis began to cooperate actively with the most 
radical forces demanding to restore power almost by armed means: 
"We must create a market economy, but political stability in the 
country is needed to do this. A strong hand must sweep away all 
customs barriers in the path to a market economy. 
  "I see imposing a state of emergency throughout the country 
as the only solution. A Committee of National Salvation should 
be formed on a coalition basis. Let it include left-wingers, 
right-wingers, and centrists. One condition--reject fighting on 
ideological matters (socialism, capitalism, and so forth) for 
the sake of saving a unified federative state. The congress 
should transfer all executive and legislative powers to this 
committee and disband for the period of forming the market, 
about 5-10 years." 
  It is not by chance, therefore, that Alksnis supported the 
August GKChP--not Yanayev himself, then at least the goals of 
the putsch organizers. He assessed the collapse of the coup this 
way: "This was a difficult defeat during those August days. But 
as a military man, I also know army wisdom: Losing one 
engagement does not mean losing the battle; losing the battle 
does not mean losing the campaign; and losing the campaign does 
not mean losing the war. Therefore, it is not evening yet." 
Already in July 1992, he confirmed this confidence with a 
statement made over television that he "was helping in every way 
by non-parliamentary means to overthrow the current government," 
and unless an armed coup becomes the staging like the putsch of 
the GKChP, he certainly would take part in it. 
  Together with the radical journalist Aleksandr Nevzorov, he 
heads the Russian Liberation Movement "Nashi," which emerged 
after the army action to seize the Vilnius television center in 
1991. He became one of the organizers of the Sixth Congress of 
the USSR People's Deputies "in the underground," which demanded 
restoration of the USSR, rejection of "capitalization" of the 
economy, and so forth. Alksnis also had a quite specific 
position with respect to the armed forces: "If Russia has an 
army, this will be the finale both for Russia and the Union. 
Today the former USSR is personified practically only by the 
army. Russia's attempt to take the armed forces under its 
jurisdiction will lead only to more destabilization in society, 
to exacerbation of relations between the republics and Russia..." 
  Lately, Viktor Alksnis is rarely seen on the pages of the 
press, on speaker's platforms, or at rallies. However, the 
majority of analysts will not hide far away their folders of 
excerpts labeled "Alksnis," believing that the stern colonel has 
still not had his final say in politics, especially since the 
word "communism" made a noteworthy evolution on his lips: "They 
are trying to present me as an orthodox communist, although I am 
not interested in any `isms.' I consider myself a nationalist." 
This, it seems, is not far from the truth: An American 
journalist, having analyzed all 52 speeches made by Alksnis at 
the Congress and sessions of the Supreme Soviet, did not find a 
single reference to socialism or communism. 
  In October 1992, Alksnis joined the Organizational Committee 
of the National Salvation Front, soon after banned by President 
B. Yeltsin. 
  Alksnis's wife is a history instructor. His favorite 
television journalist is A.G. Nevzorov. He is an ardent fan of 
the Beatles. Of the classical writers he prefers Bach and 
Vivaldi. He listens with pleasure to songs of the bards, 
especially Okudzhava and Vizbor. 
<H5>  Rulsan Sultanovich Aushev </H5>
  He was born in the village of Bolodarskoye, Kokchetav 
Oblast, 
Kazakhstan, to the family of a white-collar worker. He is an 
Ingush by nationality. His family ended up in Kazakhstan as a 
result of the sadly well-known Stalin decree of 1944, under 
which Chechens and Ingush were resettled from their native land 
in the Northern Caucasus to Central Asia and Kazakhstan. True, 
by the time he was born, the purely punitive actions against 
entire nationalities were ended, but some of his first 
recollections of childhood were restrictions of the right to 
move, the need to register at the commandant's headquarters, and 
conversations about what had happened with his people in the 
terrible year of 1944. 
  Aushev has been in the Army since 1971. He graduated from 
the 
Ordzhonikidze Higher Combined-Arms Command School. In general, 
as they tell it, the three brothers--Ruslan, Adam, and 
Bagautdin--chose the military profession at the order of their 
father: Several hundred men from the ancient Aushev family 
fought at fronts of the Great Patriotic War as privates, but no 
one had become an officer. That is why Sultan Yusupovich advised 
his sons to enroll in military schools. 
  Ruslan's service went normally at first: lieutenant, 
captain, 
platoon, company, garrison, exercises, alert. His stellar hour 
came in Afghanistan, where he commanded a motorized rifle 
battalion. 
  After several successful combat operations and, most 
importantly, after the Kremlin leadership made the decision to 
no longer be silent about the participation of Soviet troops in 
battles but, on the contrary, to describe the war as a heroic 
deed of real men--they took notice of Ruslan Aushev. He was one 
of the first Soviet soldiers to receive the title of Hero of the 
Soviet Union for participation in combat operations in 
Afghanistan (Decree of the Presidium of the USSR Supreme Soviet, 
7 May 1982). He was almost the ideal soldier: brave, courageous, 
reliable. For example, there was an instance when he was 
seriously wounded while repelling an attack on an Afghan-Soviet 
column; however, he agreed to go to the medical battalion only 
after the attackers had retreated. After an operation lasting 
many hours and treatment, he again returned to Afghanistan. 
  For many he has remained a symbol of the Soviet 
soldier-internationalist, helping the friendly people of 
Afghanistan to fight counter-revolution and to build a new life. 
  It must be noted that Aushev has never once publicly talked 
about the true essence of that war. On the other hand, he also 
was not among those who fiercely attacked Academician Andrey 
Sakharov when he accused Soviet military authorities in 
Afghanistan of the intentional destruction of their soldiers 
when they ended up being surrounded. 
  In 1985, R. Aushev graduated from the Military Academy imeni 
M.V. Frunze. 
  In 1989, Lieutenant Colonel R. Aushev, commander of a 
motorized rifle regiment of the Far East Military District, was 
elected USSR people's deputy (from the Ussuriysk Territorial 
Electoral District of Maritime Kray). He finished serving in the 
Far East in the position of deputy chief of an army combat 
training department. 
  Today his military rank is major-general. He is chairman of 
the Committee for Affairs of Soldier-Internationalists of the 
CIS member-states. 
  In connection with his appointment in September 1991 as 
chairman of the Committee for Affairs of 
Soldier-Internationalists under the USSR President (minister for 
Afghan veterans), he has been transferred into the reserve of 
the armed forces. 
<H5>  Matvey Prokopyevich Burlakov </H5>
  This person with such a specifically Russian name is 
presently serving in Germany, in the center of the country with 
which Russians have fought twice over the last century. He is 
commander-in-chief of the Western Group of Forces, and in this 
post he is encountering perhaps the most serious difficulties of 
all his peers: Amidst the temptations of "developed capitalism," 
he must keep the Army from degradation to the state of a group 
of uncontrollable armed people trading whatever they like in 
pursuit of an extra hundred convertible German marks. 
  Matvey Prokopyevich Burlakov was born on 19 August 1935 in 
the city of Ulan-Ude to a working-class family. He graduated 
from the Omsk Military School imeni M.V. Frunze in 1957, the 
Military Academy imeni M.V. Frunze in 1968, and the Military 
Academy of the General Staff of the USSR Armed Forces in 1977. 
  He began his officer service as military school graduates 
usually do--in the position of rifle platoon commander and later 
commanded a company. He served in various regions of the 
country--in the Far East, in the Far North, in the Transbaykal 
region. "In the 36 years I have spent in the Army, I have had 
the opportunity to replace dozens of garrisons," the general 
noted. From 1968 he was a deputy regimental commander and from 
1969 to 1973 a regimental commander. Then he was a division 
commander for four years and in 1977 became an army corps 
commander. He was an army commander from 1979 to 1983 and from 
1983 to 1988 chief of staff and first deputy commander of the 
Transbaykal Military District. 
  Then fate did him a favorable turn--he was sent to a 
civilized "overseas" assignment, to Hungary, to command the 
Southern Group of Forces. True, time was already marking off the 
final months of the Soviet forces stay in this country, and 
Matvey Burlakov was quickly drawn into the negotiations on the 
withdrawal of the Army from Hungary--with all the bills and 
payments, desertion, transfer of property, transportation, 
ecological claims, and the like. Such experience at the "top" 
was considered quite useful, and in 1990 Burlakov was sent to an 
even more important "front"--to a unified Germany. 
  He was named commander-in-chief of the Western Group of 
Forces (replacing 65-year-old General of the Army Boris Snetkov) 
before 1992, when he officially began to be considered the 
"authorized agent of the Russian Federation Government for the 
Western Group of Forces," which does not mean that he stopped 
being number one in the Western Group of Forces [WGF]. This post 
in the Soviet Army was always considered very important: This 
position was held in various years by Marshals of the Soviet 
Union Grechko, Kulikov, and Kurkotkin, and Generals of the Army 
Lushev and Ivanovskiy. Matvey Burlakov commented on his 
assignment to the FRG in this way: "I will never get used to the 
difficulties of army life," he said in an interview with TASS. 
  Observers note General Burlakov's attempts to establish 
closer and trusting relations with federal and land authorities 
of the FRG, the population, and the Bundeswehr command 
authorities. He began holding regular "open houses" in the 
Soviet garrisons. A public affairs office was created to 
establish closer ties with the German public and press in the 
WFG. A new rubric, "Get to Know Us, Germany," was introduced in 
the newspaper of the WGF, SOVETSKAYA ARMIYA, and an office for 
coverage of life in the WGF in German is being created at the 
Volga radio station. 
  But on the other hand, many Russian military men prefer to 
remain cautiously silent about Burlakov's activities in 
connection with the openly growing commercialization of the Army 
today. Fairly scandalous disclosures have appeared in both the 
German and Russian press concerning certain representatives of 
the higher command staff selling nearly all the military 
property they could that was under their control. In a special 
report devoted specially to this topic, the Hamburg weekly DER 
SPIEGEL stated, in particular, that high-ranking military are 
involved in machinations concerning subventions of the European 
Community, financial accounts, and various fraudulent deals. In 
doing so, they gladly use the 12 billion marks and also the 
various benefits allotted to them by the German government. 
"Directly or through illegal transactions, huge sums of currency 
from property of the Western Group of Forces are ending up in 
private accounts in Zurich, Geneva, or New York," claims the 
weekly. They use such methods as the organizing of joint stock 
companies by officers in order to sell Army property through 
them not without benefit for themselves; selling through private 
channels goods received by the Army which are exempt from 
customs and taxes; taking advantage of the fact that, from the 
legal standpoint, the territory of units of the Western Group of 
Forces is considered foreign territory, that is, tax-free zones 
on which it is very profitable for German firms to 
operate--naturally, not without an appropriate bonus for those 
who authorize this. 
  In this connection, DER SPIEGEL cites a photograph from the 
first page of a commercial proposal of the firm Mir Trade with a 
handwritten resolution by General Burlakov: "The proposal is 
good and we must support relations because everything is much 
cheaper." However, the magazine found evidence that the Mir 
Trade's products are more expensive than those of its 
competitors, and its deliveries are usually late and, in 
addition, small and of poor quality. DER SPIEGEL quotes one of 
Burlakov's subordinates, who stated in this regard: "Either he 
cannot do better, or he does not know better, or he has been 
bribed." 
  Earning currency by all methods has become a calamity 
eroding 
the fighting spirit of the troops. But Russian sources maintain 
that all this would have been impossible without decisions on 
this sort of activities made at fairly high levels: It is not 
likely that German firms would have been granted the 
"opportunity to visit an exhibit at one of the military units of 
models of WGF property authorized for sale" without their 
consent. 
  Matvey Burlakov is married to Viktoriya Nikolayevna. Their 
son is an officer who began serving in a remote garrison after 
graduation from a military school. They also have a daughter. 
  According to certain sources, the general is considered 
accessible and simple in dealing with journalists. He enjoys 
chess, swimming, and volleyball. "I try not to miss a single 
literary work or theatrical play, if duty permits," he likes to 
emphasize. 
<H5>  Valentin Ivanovich Varennikov </H5>
  He is a general of the army and was born 15 December 1923 in 
Krasnodar. He graduated from the Military Academy imeni M.V. 
Frunze in 1954 and the Military Academy of the General Staff of 
the USSR Armed Forces imeni K.Ye. Voroshilov in 1967. 
  He began military service in 1941 as an infantry school 
cadet. During the Great Patriotic War and the postwar years, he 
was a battery commander, regimental artillery and intelligence 
officer, and regimental commander. He was the standard bearer in 
the Victory Parade of 1945. In 1960 he became deputy commander 
of a motorized rifle division and then division commander. 
Between 1967 and 1971 he was a corps commander and army 
commander. He was first deputy commander in chief of the Group 
of Soviet Forces in Germany 1971-1973; commander of the 
Carpathian Military District 1973-1979; chief of the Main 
Directorate and first deputy chief of the General Staff of the 
USSR Armed Forces 1979-1984; first deputy chief of the General 
Staff of the USSR Armed Forces 1984-1989. During this period he 
was in Afghanistan. He was commander in chief of the Ground 
Forces and deputy USSR minister of defense 1989-1991. In the 
military districts he was known as a great admirer of technical 
innovations. 
  Like other top military leaders, Varennikov also assumed 
public posts: He was a deputy of the USSR Supreme Soviet, 
9th-10th convocations, and deputy of the RSFSR Supreme Soviet, 
8th and 11th convocations. At the same time, he has been a CPSU 
member since 1944 and in 1986-1990 was elected a candidate 
member to the CPSU Central Committee. He was a delegate at the 
"perestroyka" 28th CPSU Congress. When during the course of 
perestroyka Mikhail Gorbachev decided to hold at least limited 
democratic elections, General Varennikov was elected in one of 
the distant electoral districts and in 1989 became a USSR 
people's deputy. 
  He has been awarded the Order of Lenin, the Order of the 
October Revolution, four Orders of the Red Banner, an Order of 
Kutuzov First Class, two Orders of the Patriotic War Second 
Class, Order of the Red Star, and the Order for Service to the 
Motherland in the USSR Armed Forces Third Class. 
  Varennikov was considered an advocate of a hard line in 
relations with union republics, and it obviously was not by 
chance that he represented the interests of the USSR Armed 
Forces during negotiations with Latvia in April 1991. 
  General Varennikov cannot be reproached for lack of 
political 
activeness: Among USSR people's deputies, he was an ardent 
supporter of preserving communism in the USSR and the USSR 
itself, for returning to a planned distribution economy, and for 
instituting order. In July 1990, he spoke out against 
depoliticization of the Army. 
  In personal terms, they speak of him as a person not without 
a disposition toward increased comfort, outward luster, and a 
certain amount of play-acting. In May 1991, the Union Parliament 
(Commission on Privileges) raised the question that Varennikov's 
family flew on vacation aboard a special-schedule military 
aircraft. Then the matter was hushed up. The current head of the 
CIS Combined Armed Forces, Yevgeniy Shaposhnikov, also took part 
in this matter. At the same time, according to comments, one 
cannot say that Varennikov lacks personal courage and bravery. 
  He was arrested in August 1991 in the Emergency Committee 
case as one its most active organizers. It was charged, in 
particular, that he delivered an ultimatum to Gorbachev at Foros 
and then to Kravchuk in Kiev. President Boris Yeltsin publicly 
accused Varennikov of demanding his execution, which the general 
categorically denied. 
  Varennikov is married to Yelena Tikhonovna. They have two 
sons. 
<H5>  Dmitriy Antonovich Volkogonov </H5>
  A military adviser to the President of Russia, and lately, 
after a serious illness, rarely appearing in public, 
Colonel-General Dmitriy Antonovich Volkogonov was born in 1928. 
He has been in the armed forces since 1949. 
  He graduated from a military tank school and the Military 
Political Academy. He is a people's deputy of the Russian 
Federation. 
  He has gone from senior department instructor of the 
Military 
Political Academy imeni V.I. Lenin to deputy chief of the Main 
Military Political Directorate of the Soviet Army and Navy 
(Glavpur). In 1990, he was appointed chief of the Institute of 
Military History. 
  He is a doctor of philosophical sciences, doctor of 
historical sciences, and a corresponding member of the Russian 
Academy of Sciences. He has authored about 50 books, the main 
ones of which are considered those which comprise the trilogy 
"The Leaders" [Vozhdi] (Lenin, Stalin, Trotskiy). 
  Volkogonov participated in drawing up the new edition of 
"History of the Second World War," but was criticized for an 
excessively free (from the military leadership's viewpoint) 
interpretation of the events of those years and was discharged 
from the staff of the editorial college by Minister of Defense 
Dmitriy Yazov. 
  Both before and during perestroyka, as deputy chief of the 
Glavpur, he wrote a great many books, pamphlets, and textbooks 
aimed at "improving combat and political training and 
ideological literacy of soldiers and officers" and actively 
participated in the struggle "for the purity of Marxist-Leninist 
theory." 
  Volkogonov himself does not hide the following: "I have 
exerted much effort to strengthen the communist system, for 
which I do not dismiss responsibility from myself... I was both 
a Stalinist and for a long an orthodox Marxist and believed that 
this system could be reformed, as Gorbachev tried to do. But I 
became convinced very soon that communism and totalitarianism 
could not be reformed; they simply had to leave the historical 
arena..." 
  Back in 1989, in the book "Triumph and Tragedy. I.V. Stalin. 
A Political Portrait.", Dmitriy Volkogonov wrote about Lenin. 
"This man's genius was great...," "True socialism, as Lenin saw 
it, is when man is at the center of attention. Lenin's concept 
of socialism is democracy, humanism, man, social justice." 
However, already in 1992, D.A. Volkogonov interprets Lenin as an 
"unattractive personality" and a "primitive philosopher." 
  Elected a people's deputy of Russia in 1990, he immediately 
declared himself a pro-democracy politician representing the 
left wing and supporting Boris Yeltsin. Out of fear that the 
Congress of People's Deputies might move to the right, he and 
Stepashin created a left-of-center deputy group with a liberal 
democratic orientation: "The faction is small, 1/8 to 1/10 of 
all deputies. They are predominantly the intelligentsia, 
professors, and representatives of industrial circles." On the 
whole, the group "Left-Center" numbered about 100 people in the 
Congress and about 30 in the Supreme Soviet. At one time it was 
the Left-Center that proposed the compromise version on the 
question of land ownership adopted by the Congress. Volkogonov 
explains his political choice in this way: "The Cromwells and 
Peters the First were more left of center. They were fairly 
radical, but did not lose reason." 
  Such a position moved him to the very top of the power 
mountain: The general is a member of the President's 
Consultative Council, was chairman of the State Commission for 
Creating the Ministry of Defense, Army, and Navy of the Russian 
Federation, and headed the Parliament Commission on the Receipt 
and Transfer of Archives of the CPSU and KGB. Nevertheless, he 
states: "I am simply a scientist. And I am involved in politics 
only because of the situation that has taken shape in the 
country." 
  Unlike B. Yeltsin, who just recently promised the beginning 
of prosperity for the fall of 1992, he believes that Russia will 
reach the lowest point of the crisis only at the very end of 
this year or the beginning of next year, namely reach, but not 
pass, for the period of the "plateau" may last 2-3 years. And 
the entire transition period, in the opinion of Dmitriy 
Volkogonov, may drag out 10-12 years. 
<H5>  Pavel Sergeyevich Grachev </H5>
  Russia got its own Ministry of Defense on 16 March 1992. 
Those who predicted that Andrey Kokoshin or even Galina 
Starovoytova would become minister of defense did not proved 
true. The president himself took over the position, true with 
the stipulation that it was "temporary." Yeltsin appointed 
Colonel-General Pavel Grachev as his first deputy. Then in early 
May, Yeltsin entrusted him with the duties of minister of 
defense and promoted him to the rank of general of the army. 
  On 18 May 1992, General of the Army Pavel Sergeyevich 
Grachev 
was officially appointed minister of defense of the Russian 
Federation. In Russian history, he is one of the youngest 
military ministers (he became minister at 44). 
  Pavel Grachev was born on 1 January 1948 in the village of 
Rvy, Tula Oblast. His mother was a milkmaid, his father a 
metalworker. No one in the family had ever been in the military. 
After he graduated from school, he enrolled in the Ryazan 
Airborne School. In 1969, he graduated as a lieutenant and was 
sent to Kaunas as commander of a parachute platoon. Then he was 
commander of a training company at the Ryazan School, commander 
of a battalion in Lithuania and in a training division. In 1978, 
in the position of battalion commander he enrolled in the 
Academy imeni M.V. Frunze. Upon graduation from it in 1981, he 
was sent to Afghanistan to the separate 354th Parachute Regiment 
as deputy commander. Six months later, he became commander of 
that same regiment. Between 1983 and 1985 he was chief of staff 
of the 7th Division in Kaunas. In 1984, he was promoted early to 
colonel. 
  In 1985, he was again in Afghanistan as a division 
commander. 
("I spent a total of 5 years and 3 months in Afghanistan, 
commanding paratroopers at the forward edge of the battle 
area"). In 1988, he entered the General Staff Academy. He 
graduated in 1990 and was appointed first deputy commander of 
the Airborne Troops. "Two tours in Afghanistan, two academies 
with distinction," his friends emphasize. 
  In January 1991, he became commander of the Airborne Troops. 
After the putsch, he was appointed first deputy minister of 
defense of the USSR by decrees of Yeltsin and Gorbachev. 
  The name of General Grachev became widely known after the 
events of August 1991, when the 40-year-old commander of the 
Airborne Troops, as he himself said, "refused to participate in 
the assault of the Russian White House." True, some expressed 
rather obvious doubts about this version (especially since prior 
to the trial of the organizers of the GKChP, it does not appear 
possible to establish conclusively whether or not an order for 
an assault even existed), but no one could seriously counter 
this story with anything. 
  However, the German newspaper DIE ZEIT cites facts the 
indicate at least an ambiguity of the actions of the paratroop 
commander during the critical days of August. According to its 
data, his deputy, Aleksandr Lebed, obviously not without the 
knowledge of his chief, drove to the White House on 
reconnaissance not with somebody, but with Karpukhin, commander 
of the KGB assault group "Alfa." It was this group, according to 
Karpukhin's confession, that was directed to assault the pocket 
of Russian resistance to the GKChP. 
  Pavel Grachev himself explains his actions thusly: "On 19 
August, Yazov ordered me to take five installations under 
guard--State Television and Radio, the Moscow City Soviet, the 
RSFSR Supreme Soviet, the State Bank, and the State Depository. 
But Yeltsin had also managed to assign security for himself. 
Therefore, initially it was not a question of failure to carry 
out an order: I tried to maneuver between the Army leadership 
and the Russian government. After all, the same orders can be 
carried out differently..." 
  One way or another, Russian President Boris Yeltsin and his 
then-chief military adviser, General Konstantin Kobets, did not 
refute Grachev's statements. (What is more, the president 
awarded him a phrase which probably was worth a high order 
during those days: "He protected us here.") 
  The instantaneous appointment of the young general as 
chairman of the Russian State Committee for Defense Issues shows 
that either true or cleverly played loyalty was rewarded. 
  He received the title of Hero of the Soviet Union for 
"accomplishing combat missions with minimal human losses" in 
Afghanistan. He has also been awarded two Orders of Lenin, an 
Order of the Red Banner, and an Order of the Red Star. 
  At the Army Conference of Soldier-Internationalists back on 
24 May 1991, P. Grachev stated the following: "The Army today is 
one of a few elements able to prevent the final destruction of 
our state. The process of chaotic sovereignization with attempts 
to create republic armies, which can lead to catastrophic 
consequences, prompts us to this thought... Today the struggle 
continues. And in it the fate of the most sacred and valuable 
thing we have is being decided--the fate of the motherland, the 
fate of the great union of Soviet people and its army." In this 
regard, the general demanded that "Soviet patriotism and 
adherence to socialist choice" be formed in personnel. 
  In 1991, at age 42, the guards major-general became 
commander 
of the Airborne Troops of the Soviet Union (a colonel-general 
position). As some high-ranking army sources claim, recommended 
by the very person he replaced in this post, Colonel-General 
V.A. Achalov. The latter by that time was blamed for the fact 
that under his leadership, during the mass democratic 
demonstrations in the fall of 1990, two divisions of 
parachutists advanced on Moscow. After unintelligible 
explanations of the military that these were exercises, for the 
crossing to agricultural work and the "potato" march of the 
paratroopers was firmly linked to suspicions of a planned 
overthrow or, in any event, practicing it at operational 
exercises. These suspicions seemed exaggerated, but the events 
of August 1991 confirmed them to some extent. 
  Ye. Shaposhnikov, who had taken over leadership of the 
Ministry of Defense, took Grachev as his first deputy. 
  As the minister's right-hand man, Grachev had to participate 
in negotiations on the fate of the USSR Armed Forces on the 
entire territory of the former state. He tried to throw up 
bridges with the governments of the Baltic states that had 
received their independence, pointing out, nonetheless, the 
impossibility of the withdrawal of USSR troops in a short space 
of time. The general also had to argue with Chechen President 
General Dudayev, who decided to create his own army. 
  Colleagues note Grachev's outstanding duty qualities and a 
certain military bravado. And this bravado, as a rule, has 
evoked the liking and not the fear from leaders. These personal 
qualities, apparently, were also to the liking of Boris Yeltsin, 
who went hunting and sweated in a bathhouse together with him, 
according to sources claiming to be in the know. 
  As far as the new minister's political views are concerned, 
it has not been possible to fix any stable views. Among 
political observers, he is considered a much more conservative 
figure than his previous chief, Marshal Yevgeniy Shaposhnikov. 
Basically, Grachev's speeches come down to expressing a 
determination to maintain by any means the combat effectiveness 
of the Army--the Soviet Army in the past or the Russian Army 
today--and to defend the country's interests in the military 
sphere. However, malicious tongues claim that Grachev 
understands these interests in a distinctive way. According to 
informed representatives of Russia's State Committee for Defense 
Issues, one of the general's first actions in the new post as 
minister was to visit the Moscow Garrison Stockade, where he 
personally engaged in drill training with officers being 
punished... Some of them who know him from working together 
maintain that the minister is "extremely power-hungry and does 
not tolerate objections, much less criticism." However, others 
believe that this is not quite true and that power should be 
inherent in an army commander. 
  Today, Pavel Grachev makes it understood that he follows 
Yeltsin's policy and will continue to do so, no matter what it 
is (although informed analysts believe that the military policy 
of the president is also the policy of Pavel Grachev due to the 
lack of other institutions of forming such policy in Russia). 
  The appointment of Grachev as minister of defense shocked 
many democratically oriented military people: In their opinion, 
one can forget about serious reforms in leadership of the Army; 
the ideas of a civilian Ministry of Defense have died without 
having been born; and there can be no talk of purely military 
autonomy of the General Staff. Many Army pragmatists, it is 
reported, were upset by the removal of Marshal Shaposhnikov, who 
was considered in the troops to be a fairly considerate 
commander who protected, above all, the social interests of the 
military. On the other hand, according to fragmentary 
information coming from units, many officers do not have feel 
respect either for Grachev or Shaposhnikov, believing that they, 
"no matter what they thought, they violated the oath of 
allegiance in August by not carrying out the commander's order." 
  Pavel Grachev is married and has two sons. The oldest son, 
Sergey, is graduating from the same Ryazan Airborne School and 
is to be assigned to the Transbaykal. The younger son, Valeriy, 
is in his first year at the Moscow Suvorov School, but, in the 
father's opinion, will probably not be a military man. 
<H5>  Boris Vsevolodovich Gromov </H5>
  "There is not a single Soviet soldier behind me." He went 
down in history with this statement. 
  The only thing not known is what was behind that statement: 
Relief and awareness of a well-fulfilled duty, or the secret 
despair of a commander who had lost a war he did not start. 
  And, it seems, this was not the only war lost by the 
general... 
  Boris Vsevolodovich Gromov was born on 7 November 1943 in 
Saratov. He graduated from the Kalinin Suvorov School in 1962 
and the Leningrad Combined-Arms Command School imeni S.M. Kirov 
in 1965. He began his officer service in the position of 
commander of a rifle platoon and later a company in the Baltic 
Military District. 
  After graduating with honors from the Academy imeni M.V. 
Frunze in 1972, he successively held the positions of battalion 
commander, regiment chief of staff and commander, and motorized 
rifle division chief of staff and commander. He was promoted 
early to major, lieutenant colonel, and colonel. 
  He graduated from the General Staff Academy in 1984 with a 
gold medal and was assigned as deputy commander of an army and 
later commanded an army, first in Belorussia and the 40th Army 
in Afghanistan between 1987 and 1989, simultaneously being the 
authorized agent of the USSR government for affairs on the 
temporary stay of Soviet troops in the Democratic Republic of 
Afghanistan [DRA]. 
  He had already served twice in Afghanistan before this--from 
February 1980 through August 1982 and from March 1985 through 
April 1986. 
  He is a Hero of the Soviet Union and has been awarded five 
orders and many medals. 
  In September 1992, Gromov became deputy minister of defense 
of Russia. For many observers, this appointment was unexpected. 
With the departure of M. Gorbachev, Gromov was deprived of the 
most powerful support in the highest echelons of power. He had 
no sponsors in the Main Commissariat of the CIS Combined Armed 
Forces, and the minister of defense did not demonstrate any 
special favor. And suddenly he is promoted to one of the key 
posts of the military hierarchy. 
  It is believed that the personal qualities of the new deputy 
minister played the main role in this: youth and a high degree 
of professionalism (undeclared political sympathies also played 
a significant role). Secondly, his Afghanistan military 
biography. With the good graces of Vice President Rutskoy, 
former Afghanistan veteran commanders are gradually occupying 
key posts in the central apparatus of the military department 
and in the troops. Finally, Gromov has a reputation as a 
supporter of a hard line, which, under conditions of today's 
growing chaos, is becoming increasingly popular. All this 
enabled the well-known Zbigniew Brzezinski to recommend to 
analysts and politicians: "Watch General Gromov. The hidden 
supporters of Soviet centrism are linking their hopes to him." 
  Of course, professional qualities alone are not enough to 
win 
the kind of popularity that the colonel-general enjoys today in 
Russia--fate also had to play a part. Boris Gromov became widely 
known after the 40th Army he commanded left Afghanistan. 
  Experts maintain that under him the war was conducted most 
competently, responsibly, and with the fewest casualties. 
  The withdrawal of Soviet troops from Afghanistan in 
1988-1989 
was accomplished under his command. Gromov, as the captain of a 
sinking ship, was the last to go to the Soviet shore from the 
bridge across the Amu-Darya River. Only prisoners of war were 
left behind him... 
  Next he was appointed commander of the Kiev Military 
District, from where he was unexpectedly transferred to the 
position of first deputy to USSR Minister of Internal Affairs 
Pugo. Since that time, persistent rumors have begun to travel 
back and forth that Gromov was "stern," that he was called upon 
to put pressure on democrats by using his Army experience, and 
that he was an advocate of harsh measures to protect communism. 
His signature on the famous "Word to the People," considered the 
"ideological program" of the putsch plotters and which demanded 
"restoration of socialist ideals" in the USSR, also added fuel 
to the fire. 
  Rumors were going around that it was under his direction 
that 
fairly harsh actions were taken with respect to Lithuania and 
other Baltic republics. In any case, experts agree that the 
famous Riga and Vilnius OMON's could not have operated with such 
decisiveness without support in the leadership of the USSR 
Ministry of Internal Affairs. One way or another, the scenes of 
atrocities by the military in Vilnius and the deaths of peaceful 
civilians in the Lithuanian and Latvian capitals shook the 
country and caused massive protests. Among those against whom 
these protests were directed was also Boris Gromov, whom 
democrats have since firmly linked with the ideas of force for 
the sake of preserving "socialist ideals." This was the second 
war lost by the general... 
It is curious that having become deputy minister of defense, 
he conducted negotiations with the Lithuanian government on ways 
to normalize the situation in that same Lithuania. 
  In the presidential elections in Russia, the pair of Ryzhkov 
and Gromov, nominated as vice president, collected a total of 
16.85 percent of the votes, taking second place in this 
"handicap." 
  Suspicions regarding Gromov's inclination to use force to 
solve problems and toward the fact that he may become the 
dictator whom Russia fears one day led to a huge scandal over 
his name. The general even brought suit against USSR People's 
Deputy Colonel Vilen Martirosyan, who in an interview with a 
Kiev newspaper listed him among the forces "lenient toward a 
military coup in the country." 
  It is known, however, that Gromov spoke out categorically 
against the Army's participation in internal conflicts and 
crisis situations, especially if they are associated with 
inter-ethnic conflicts. 
  Judging from General Pavel Grachev's words, Gromov behaved 
fairly loyally during the putsch: "I talked with General B.V. 
Gromov by phone, and he replied that he would not bring the 
Ministry of Internal Affairs troops anywhere." Gromov was 
present at the meeting on 20 August with Marshal Yazov at the 
USSR Ministry of Defense, where, according to the German 
newspaper DIE ZEIT, specific tasks were set forth for assaulting 
the Russian White House, but, as Gromov asserted immediately 
following the putsch, "I was concerned only about Ministry of 
Internal Affairs troops not being sent into the streets of 
Moscow." 
  General Gromov's role in the August events will possibly be 
cleared up with by history, as may the role of General Grachev. 
But for now, one this is obvious: It is not likely that he will 
become a real political figure on the right flank anytime in the 
foreseeable future. On the other hand, increased attention on 
him will not likely enable him to organize anything resembling 
an anti-government organization of officers unnoticed. 
  General Gromov is married--for the second time. His first 
wife died in an aircraft shot down in Afghanistan during its 
very approach to the Soviet border. There are two sons from that 
marriage--Maksim (now a cadet in a military school) and Andrey 
(in seventh grade). The general's present wife, who was given 
the nickname of "brilliant Faina" in Kiev, also lost her husband 
in Afghanistan. She became intimate with Gromov, having in her 
arms two twin girls--Zhenya and Valya, who graduated from first 
grade in 1992. 
<H5>  Petr Stepanovich Deynekin </H5>
  He is a colonel-general of aviation and presently 
commander-in-chief of Russia's Air Force. The last position 
prior to this--commander in chief of the USSR Air Force and 
deputy minister of defense of the USSR--from August 1991, 
becoming truly stellar for military aviators, whose commander, 
Marshal Shaposhnikov, refused to send against the Russian 
leadership. 
  He was born in the city of Morozovsk, Rostov Oblast, on 14 
December 1937. Deynekin's father, Stepan Nikolayevich, work as a 
history teacher at one of the farms on the Don and right before 
the war went to serve in aviation. He was killed in a crash in 
1943 "in the line of duty" at the age of 26 years. 
  Petr Deynekin followed in his father's footsteps into 
aviation. He graduated from the Balashov Military Aviation 
School for Pilots in 1957, the Military Air Academy imeni Yu.A. 
Gagarin in 1969, and the Military Academy of the General Staff 
in 1982 with a gold medal. 
  He began his officer service as an assistant aircraft 
commander in Long-Range Aviation. In 1973, he was commander of 
an aviation regiment, then a division commander. In 1982, he was 
appointed deputy commander of an air army. In 1985, he was 
commander of an air army. In 1990, he was first deputy commander 
in chief of the USSR Air Force. 
  Deynekin is an Honored Military Pilot of the USSR (1984). He 
has a total of 5000 flying hours. According to him, "during his 
younger flying years, he flew 500 hours a year!" He has 
qualified on nine types of aircraft, including the modern Tu-160 
base strategic bomber. The fact that he flew the famous American 
B-1B Lancer bomber in May 1992 as crew commander with an aerial 
refueling indicates the degree of his flying skill. 
  In conversations, this stocky, black-haired man without a 
trace of gray gives the impression of a strict professional not 
striving to meddle in political processes and ready to deal with 
the facts as they are. The collapse of the USSR, causing a 
division of the Army, including the Air Force, is reflected in 
the general's public speeches only as a need for a new 
understanding of his military duty: "We have begun practical 
work to bring the Air Force in line with the concept of 
organizational development of Russia's Armed Forces," says the 
general, noting today's political reality. However, he mentions 
the precept of Peter the Great: "He who has taken the oath to 
the banner must stand by it to the death." Analysts recall that 
Petr Deynekin actually "protected" a group of officers who had 
committed an unauthorized flight in their combat aircraft from a 
Ukrainian airfield to Russia and stated that they did not wish 
to take the Ukrainian oath. 
  At the same time, he deserves the real credit for preventing 
a split of the Army into rival political groupings. When at the 
All-Army Officers' Assembly, convened at the request of the 
communist-oriented portion of the military several weeks after 
the August putsch, some of those gathered there demanded the 
resignation of Marshal Shaposhnikov, who, in their opinion, was 
too loyal to "the democrats ruining the Army," it was Air Force 
Commander in Chief Deynekin who stated that if Shaposhnikov 
goes, so will all the military pilots. The pro-communist 
delegates decided against open confrontation, and analysts 
consider namely this episode to be the key point in the 
establishment of control over the Army by the new Russian 
leadership. 
  In the opinion of observers, General Petr Deynekin enjoys 
popularity among the troops. In turn, he is also considered a 
great patriot of the Air Force, placing it above the others in 
the age-old rivalry between branches of troops. He is also 
popular among the managers of the military industrial complex: 
One of his major accomplishments is that 18 billion rubles were 
invested in the aviation industry during just the first six 
months of the crisis year of 1992. 
  He is married and has three children. 
  He loves to spend his free time in nature (hunting or 
fishing) with family and friends. He reads much. He loves 
windsurfing and water skiing and goes to the theater. 
<H5>  Viktor Petrovich Dubynin </H5>
  On 10 June, at a meeting in the Ministry of Defense of 
Russia, Boris Yeltsin announced his decision to appoint 
Colonel-General Viktor Petrovich Dubynin to the position of 
chief of the General Staff and first deputy minister of defense 
of Russia. 
  He was born on 1 February 1943 in the city of 
Kamensk-Uralskiy (Sverdlovsk Oblast). He graduated from the Far 
Eastern Tank School in 1964. He began his service in the troops 
in the position of tank platoon commander. He commanded a 
company, battalion, and regiment. 
  In 1981, he headed a tank brigade stationed at the border 
with Poland. In an interview with the Polish press in April 
1992, Dubynin admitted that if General Jaruzelski had not 
imposed martial law in Poland in December 1981, Soviet troops 
would have entered and occupied the country. General Jaruzelski 
confirmed this statement. 
  Dubynin graduated from the Military General Staff Academy in 
1984. After graduating from it, he became first deputy commander 
of an army. In 1986, he became commander of an army in the 
Turkestan Military District. He participated in the war in 
Afghanistan. In 1987, he was commander of a tank army in the 
Belorussian Military District. 
  Between 1988 and 1989, he was chief of staff and first 
deputy 
commander of the Kiev Military District. 
  In June 1989, he became commander of the Northern Group of 
Forces stationed in Poland. 
  In February 1991, General Dubynin refused to allow the 
Polish 
military department to conduct an inspection on the territory of 
one of the military units where, the Poles claimed, Soviet 
chemical weapons located. A number of deputies of the Polish 
Sejm (parliament) wanted to declare Dubynin persona non 
grata for an "improper attitude towards Polish colleagues." 
  In April 1991, General Dubynin began overseeing the 
withdrawal of Soviet troops from the territory of Poland (they 
had been there since 1944, however, no one had ever raised the 
question of their withdrawal before). The troop withdrawal that 
had begun at that time according to a schedule agreed upon only 
between the command authorities of the Northern Group of Forces 
(i.e., V. Dubynin) and the Ministry of Defense of Poland. It was 
anticipated that an inter-state treaty on this matter would be 
ready and signed by Mikhail Gorbachev and Lech Walesa in late 
1991. However, at that time, as a result of the instability of 
the Polish side and the well-known August events in the USSR, 
preparation of the documents was dragged out, and the meeting 
between the presidents did not take place. The documents were 
signed by L. Walesa and B. Yeltsin in April 1992. Speaking 
during the departure of the first subunit of Soviet troops from 
Poland for the homeland, General Dubynin admitted that the USSR 
at one time had secretly stored its nuclear weapons on the 
territory of Poland; however, it had withdrawn them back before 
the start of the troop withdrawal. Answering questions by 
correspondents recalling the incident with chemical weapons, 
Dubynin remarked that the USSR has never had a single chemical 
weapon of any type on the territory of Poland. 
  The short history of the general's appointment to the new 
position is noteworthy. On the first day of a conference at the 
Ministry of Defense of Russia held 10-11 June, Viktor Dubynin 
was officially designated as responsible for the withdrawal of 
Russian troops from the territory of Poland. But already on the 
second day, the president announced his new appointment. It 
remains only to guess what kind of a secret is hidden behind 
this little-known fact. 
  Attentive observers also note the following fact: All 
previous chiefs of the General Staff had one of the three 
"nuclear briefcases." Dubynin does not have it--the third 
"briefcase" (after the president and minister of defense) is in 
reserve... 
<H5>  Dzhokhar Musayevich Dudayev </H5>
  A native of the Chechen-Ingush ASSR and a Chechen. Born in 
1944 at the time when all Chechens were sent by order of Stalin 
to Kazakhstan and Central Asia. He spent his childhood here 
right up until Khrushchev authorized the Chechens and Ingush to 
return to their homeland in 1957. His passport data are 
distorted. His birth date of 15 May is written approximately. 
  At one time he completed a physical mathematics course and 
then the Tambovsk Higher Military Aviation School imeni M. 
Raskovaya, and the Military Air Academy imeni Gagarin in 1977. 
He joined the CPSU in 1968 and has not formally left the party. 
He served in Siberia, Afghanistan, and other regions. He is a 
military pilot-engineer 1st class and has 12 governmental awards. 
  Since childhood his peers remember his as a very passionate 
person, even for a Chechen (however, according to those around 
him, today Dudayev has learned to restrain his emotions and 
appear quite calm in all situations), fairly straightforward, 
not without ambition, bordering on ambitiousness. It is likely 
that this is what helped him achieve promotions in the military 
that are quite rare for representatives of his nationality--to 
the position of division commander. What is more, he is the 
first Chechen general in the Soviet Army. 
  Colleagues characterize him as a strict, quick-tempered, 
abrupt person whose handwriting is even nervous. He also was 
often reproached for authoritarianism and love of power. In the 
words of his comrade in arms Yusup Soslanbekov, among Estonians 
(his division was stationed in Tartu) Dudayev was known as the 
"rebellious general," having once refused to carry out an order 
on blockading the television station and parliament of Estonia. 
  It could not be established if this was actually the case, 
but according to comments of those who served with him, in 
previous years Colonel Dudayev was more than loyal with respect 
to the CPSU. Quite aggressively, in the words of one of the 
political workers who served under him, "he taught political 
affairs officers how to love the party": "You are called upon to 
serve the party as chain workers which the Central Committee has 
released and is paying money for this!" 
  However, today he believes that he did more for this party 
than it did for him. 
  Dudayev retired back in May 1990, when, as they told it, 
Chechens arriving in Tartu requested him to do so. Dudayev and 
his air division were assigned from Tartu to Groznyy. 
Assumptions were stated that in doing so, 1000 nuclear warheads 
in the air division's inventory were also brought to Groznyy. 
When Dudayev put in for retirement, Deynekin, presently 
colonel-general and commander of the CIS Air Forces, flew to him 
in Groznyy and offered Dudayev high Army posts, including 
commander of an air army. Dudayev replied: "The highest position 
for me is to be an ordinary Chechen." And he headed the 
Executive Committee of the Nationwide Congress of the Chechen 
People (OKChN) in opposition to the authorities. In essence, he 
came to power on the wave of popular revolt, after the Executive 
Committee sided with the Russian Parliament and President 
Yeltsin during the first hours of the putsch on 19 August 1991. 
The republic's parliament came to its senses only on 21 August 
and adopted a decree condemning the Emergency Committee, but it 
was too late. Freedom Square filled with people. Barricades were 
built. People were recruited into the "National Guard." 
  As a result, the OKChN Executive Committee dissolved the 
republic's Supreme Soviet and led the former chairman of the 
Supreme Soviet, Doku Zavgayev, out of the building. The dirty 
work was done by national guardsmen--armed detachments of 
volunteers created by the chairman of the OKChN Executive 
Committee, General Dudayev. Thus, he ended up with the power, 
and Russia's Supreme Soviet was faced with a dilemma--to 
recognize it or not to recognize it: The illegitimacy of the 
new, and initially perceived as allied, regime was indisputable. 
  However, the dilemma soon resolved itself: After several 
harshly stated demands by Dudayev about granting Chechnya 
complete independence from Russia, the White House condemned his 
regime in equally harsh terms in the decree of 8 October 1991 by 
the Presidium of the RSFSR Supreme Soviet and by the Supreme 
Soviet of 10 October 1991 "On the Political Situation in 
Chechen-Ingushetia." In response, Groznyy announced setting 27 
October as the date for elections for parliament and president 
of the republic, with which it beat back the attacks by jurists: 
Dudayev was soon elected president entirely legally. 
  On 2 November 1991, according to the official formula, "as a 
result of the long national-liberation struggle of the Chechen 
people," the "Chechen State" was proclaimed. 
  Dudayev's supporters expressed joy over Dudayev's election 
as 
president by firing hunting rifles, assault rifles, machineguns, 
and pistols in the center of Groznyy. 
  The Chechens fully supported the general. The editor of the 
newspaper SVOBODA, Lecha Yakhyayev, wrote about Dudayev: "He is 
not like all of us. He does not have a red cent to his name, nor 
does he have a powerful family or tribal clan behind him, and 
what is most dreadful--he is honest." His former colleagues also 
are not inclined to suspect him of violating the second 
commandment; no one can claim that he was a thief, says one of 
his subordinates. In any case, today General Dudayev serves as 
the personification of a "new leader" for activists of the 
national movement: military bone, a "firm hand," and a 
democratic reputation. 
  In the opinion of some experts, it is not a question of a 
wide-scale shift of Chechen values, but of Dudayev's personal 
ambitions and the persons associated with him, about whose 
demands the general dissatisfaction with the state of affairs in 
the country was localized. Typical in this regard are the words 
of Judge Shepa Gadayev: "Dudayev is an honest person, is not 
connected to our system that is corrupted at all levels, and is 
not involved in the covering up of tribal and selfish top-level 
ties. Only such energetic and unselfish people can change this." 
This is also confirmed by Russian analysts: "He did not choose 
the national idea, it chose him. D. Dudayev came to the congress 
as a guest and was elected chairman of the Executive Committee." 
  Since the general transferred the House of Political 
Enlightenment to the Islamic Institute the next day, there 
continues to be a variety of speculation about the "Muslim 
component" of his politics. Some analysts believe that Dudayev 
is actually a willing leader for the movement of Islamic 
fundamentalism. The behavior, statements, and politics of the 
former orthodox communist seem to many to confirm this thought: 
From exotic details such as Dudayev banning the practice of male 
gynecologists under the threat of criminal punishment to a 
persistent quest for contacts with Muslim republics of the 
former USSR and the Muslim world abroad. 
  It is curious that it was the Islamic Path Party that 
nominated the retired general as a presidential candidate: "The 
Islamic Path Party nominates Dudayev as its candidate for 
president of the Chechen Republic. Only the election of Dudayev 
as president of the Chechen Republic will stabilize the 
situation, preclude the possibility of clan opposition, and lead 
the republic to democratic reforms," it states in the decision 
of this party's council. "I have become the first president of 
the Chechen Republic by the will of Allah and of the people," 
was the first statement Dudayev made at a press conference after 
a preliminary counting of votes. 
  "I am a Muslim," Dudayev himself asserts. "This religion has 
been close to me since childhood. I do not observe the hours of 
prayer and turn to Allah usually in my heart. I ask him to 
protect me from evil, vices, and evil spirit." 
  However, many attentive politologists believe that the Islam 
in his politics is a screen, and Dudayev is persistently seeking 
support of the Muslim world to fight for the hegemony of 
Chechnya in the Caucasus and creation under its aegis a certain 
"Commonwealth of States and Peoples of the Great Caucasus," and 
also to be prepared for a possible serious clash with the mother 
country. It is precisely this conflict with Russia that 
determines today's imperatives of the general-president's 
foreign and domestic policy. 
  Presidential candidate Dzhokhar Dudayev built his campaign 
on 
a main thesis: Sovereignty outside of Russia. Dudayev, in turn, 
evokes fears in Moscow not only by his distinctly expressed 
extremism in achieving independence but also threats to initiate 
terrorism in Russia in the event of an attack by the latter on 
Chechnya. He himself does not hide this, saying: "To those in 
the White House who issue completely insane orders and are 
willing to organize global bloodshed on our land, I dare to 
reassure: We will deliver a terrible blow. Thirty minutes will 
be enough for there to be a mountain of corpses. And the grief 
of the mothers of Russian soldiers will be immeasurable." 
Dudayev threatens to "burn Russia in a nuclear fire" and states: 
"My physical destruction is the state program of the leadership 
of Russia." 
  As far as other aspects of Dudayev's politics are concerned, 
it obviously will be characterized by two factors in the future: 
Chechnya's desire to dominate in the Northern Caucasus and 
repression of the opposition. Among analysts, the following 
statements of the general-president are considered more than 
typical: "We do not forget that we bear the responsibility for 
the fate of our fraternal peoples of the Caucasus. Uniting the 
peoples of the Caucasus into a unified community of equals is 
the only correct and promising path in the future. We, and I 
personally, attach special significance to the question of 
unifying the Caucasus. We are obligated to become the initiators 
of this unification, for we are at the center of interests of 
the peoples of our mountain territory, both geographically and 
economically, as well as ethnically." Dudayev believes that such 
a path also has a good economic base: "We intend to switch to 
our own currency. After all, we have rich land and are almost 
the richest in the world in mineral resources, soil fertility, 
and climate. The republic exports to 140 countries." 
  However, the objective indicators are less optimistic. 
Despite the fact that Chechen-Ingushetia has essentially a 
monopoly in production of aviation oils, supplying more than 90 
percent of their consumption in the CIS. There are 200,000 
able-bodied people unemployed in the republic. In several 
populated areas, up to 80-90 percent are unemployed. 
Chechen-Ingushetia ranks in last place at 73rd in the CIS for 
nearly all vitally important indicators. It ranks third from 
last for infant mortality. 
  Therefore, it is not by chance that the president is 
intensifying the search for ways to increase assistance from 
abroad, in particular, in organizing the petroleum industry and 
obtaining Arab credits. Thus, in August 1992, at the invitation 
of King of Saudi Arabia Fahd bin Abd al-Aziz and Amir of Kuwait 
Jabir al-Ahmad al-Sabah, he visited these countries. He was 
given a warm reception, but the request to recognize the 
independence of Chechnya was not granted. But there was still a 
perceptible propaganda effect from this visit, especially 
against the background of Russia's growing difficulties in the 
Northern Caucasus. 
  The general-president uses constantly changing tactics with 
respect to Russia--from emphasized loyalty within the framework 
of economic relations (not without regular threats, however, of 
reconsidering such a policy) to rather harsh actions within the 
framework of political relations. His supporters stated that 
"formally we have been in a state of war with Russia since 1859, 
for no treaty was signed at that time." Some experts consider 
his words, which he often repeats, to be programmed: "In the 
event of aggressive actions by Russia against the Chechen 
people, all of the Caucasus will rise up. And Russia will lose 
its peaceful life for a long time. Seeing that undisguised 
violence is being committed against the Chechen people, the 
whole Muslim world will rise up. Chechnya is the center of 300 
years of confrontation between the Caucasus and Russia." In 
corridors of the "Unified Caucasian Home" round table held in 
Groznyy in early September, Dudayev stated that "the future of 
world civilization belong to the origin of world 
civilization--the Caucasus." 
  A curious detail: Instead of a monument to Lenin, Dudayev 
has 
decided to place a monument to Khrushchev in Groznyy--Nikita 
Sergeyevich returned the Chechens to their homeland. The general 
has declared his great respect for Mikhail Gorbachev. He also 
once offered political asylum to the former leader of the GDR, 
Erich Honecker, who was being pursued by FRG justice: "It is not 
difficult for us to rescue and protect one destitute old man." 
Dudayev called Honecker a self-sufficient democrat who "erected 
the Berlin wall by no means of his own will." 
  Dudayev is a good athlete and, as they say, an excellent 
family man. His wife Alla is an artist. They have three 
children--a daughter and two sons. One of the local newspapers 
called him a messenger from God. He is also sometimes called a 
"Chechen Yeltsin." 
  Since September 1992, Dudayev has been living in a small 
house in the community of Katayama, which is in the city limits 
of Groznyy. Before this he and his family lived with his older 
brother. 
  The general usually does not dwell at great length on his 
personal life. He once said, however: "I have had no personal 
life since I became involved in politics. Everyone in my family 
loves painting; my wife is a designer and draws a great deal. I 
like music, the poetry of Lermontov, Pushkin, the Decembrist 
poets, and the Russian classical writers--Tolstoy, Chekhov... I 
study karate, and my black belt instructor is always with me." 
In his childhood, he "played soccer and took up 
wrestling--classical and free-style. I even became republic 
school champion," Dudayev once recalled. And now, being 
president, he can launch a helicopter or aircraft high into the 
air. 
<H5>  Vladimir Grigoryevich Yegorov </H5>
  He is an admiral and commander of the Baltic Fleet, which 
was 
created by Peter the Great. 
  He has an open Russian face with soft, typically Slavic 
features, which somewhat conceal the harsh aspect of his eyes. 
But it is possible that this is the result of the tension of the 
last months after the breakup of the USSR and the proclamation 
of independence of the Baltic states laying claim today to a 
part of the property of the fleet and the former Soviet defense 
system in the water areas of the Baltic Sea. 
  The admiral admits that it is a rare night that he is not 
awakened two or three times by telephone calls. The admiral's 
concerns are more than understandable: Russia instantly lost a 
number of very important naval bases and an established coastal 
defense system, the mutual fire support of whose elements was 
formed back under Peter the Great. Three not too friendly 
states, moreover with whom there are numerous unsettled property 
disputes, are potentially hanging over the disrupted lines of 
communication between Kronshtadt and Kaliningrad... 
  However, many fleet officers admit that in such conditions 
Admiral Yegorov is a person doing what he should be doing. "If 
there are sailors from God, Vladimir Grigoryevich Yegorov is one 
of them," notes one who knows his colleague well. 
  Yegorov was born, according to some sources, in Tambovsk 
Oblast, and, according to his official biography, in Moscow on 
26 November 1938. He graduated from the Higher Naval School 
imeni M.V. Frunze in 1962 and the Military Academy of the 
General Staff in 1990, the latter without attending class. 
  He passed through all key fleet positions in succession, 
beginning with head of a department. He then was an executive 
officer, after that he commanded a large antisubmarine warfare 
ship, and was brigade chief of staff. He commanded a brigade of 
ships for seven years. After that he was commander of a naval 
base and headed the Mediterranean Squadron. His last position 
was first deputy commander of the Baltic Fleet. 
  In the fleet he is considered a "gentle" commander who does 
not like harsh rebukes of subordinates done for show. Yegorov 
himself only partly shares such assessments. "If I talk 
respectfully with people without cursing them or trampling their 
hat, is this gentleness? I demonstrate firmness when it is 
necessary, without flaunting it.." 
  Experts note his diplomatic abilities demonstrated in 
contacts with representatives of the Baltic states. Many credit 
him for the fact that the recent attacks by Estonian troops on 
Russian military units in Tallinn have not led to major armed 
clashes and interstate complications. In addition, in the fleet, 
relating differently to the Soviet Union's loss of its strategic 
positions and in general skeptically assessing today's political 
processes, they recall with satisfaction the admiral's response, 
when a correspondent from the American magazine NEW YORKER asked 
if the return of the St. Andrew's flag to ships of the Russian 
Navy means an admission that life was better under tsarism than 
under communism: "We did not live under a tsar," the commander 
stated. 
<H5>  Oleg Aleksandrovich Yerofeyev </H5>
  Vice Admiral Oleg Yerofeyev is the thirteenth commander of 
the Northern Fleet. 
  He was born in 1940 in Petropavlovsk-Kamchatsk. As those who 
have known him for a long time note, he has been attracted to 
the Navy since childhood--especially since not only his home 
town and simultaneously a major naval base played a part in 
this, but also the fact that Yerofeyev was born into a family of 
a military man, the commander of an air regiment. 
  He graduated from the Caspian Higher Naval School in 1961. 
He 
began his officer service on a diesel submarine in the Northern 
Fleet, but already in 1963 was transferred to the more 
privileged nuclear-powered submarine fleet. To date he has been 
permitted to command six projects of nuclear-powered submarines. 
He commanded a strategic submarine, then a division of attack 
submarines, and was chief of staff of a flotilla in the Pacific 
Ocean Fleet. 
  He graduated from the Naval Academy and the Military Academy 
of the General Staff, after which he was appointed commander of 
a flotilla of submarines in the Northern Fleet. Three years 
later he was chief of staff of this same fleet. He had a 
connection to the much talked about accident involving the 
nuclear submarine Komsomolets, but his name did not come to 
light in the scandalous newspaper articles concerning this. 
  He was appointed commander of the Northern Fleet in March 
1992. 
  He is a candidate of military sciences and has a daughter 
and 
granddaughter. He does not flaunt his political convictions, 
limiting himself to purely professional opinions about fleet 
combat effectiveness. 
<H5>  Igor Vladimirovich Kasatonov </H5>
  In recent months, arguments are not dying down and passions 
are raging over this name. 
  For some he is a symbol of military honor; for others he is 
a 
reactionary who does not want to recognize the realities of the 
new life. For both, however, it is unquestionable that he is a 
powerful personality having clear-cut ideas about military duty, 
law, and commander's authority. 
  Such is how the press wrote about the commander of the Black 
Sea Fleet, Igor Kasatonov. 
  I.V. Kasatonov was born on 10 February 1939 in Vladivostok 
to 
the family of a military seaman. His father, Vladimir Kasatonov, 
was once even the commander of the same Black Sea Fleet which 
until recently his son commanded and generally was fairly widely 
known in Navy circles. 
  I.V. Kasatonov graduated from the Black Sea Higher Naval 
School imeni P.S. Nakhimov in 1960. He is a naval gunner by 
specialty. He began his officer service in the position of 
battery commander and then was head of a department. 
Subsequently, he went from executive officer to commander of an 
antisubmarine warfare ship. Subordinates characterize him as a 
"stern muzhik" who knows the service and is able to achieve 
order. 
  He graduated from the Sevastopol Instrument Building 
Institute already as an officer and in 1975 graduated from the 
Naval Academy, after which he was appointed chief of staff of a 
division of ships. He graduated from the Military Academy of the 
General Staff in 1979. He commanded a division of ships from 
1980 to 1982 and became commander of a flotilla in 1982. In 1988 
he was appointed firs deputy commander of the Northern Fleet and 
in September 1991 began commanding the Black Sea Fleet, which 
came under crossfire of mutual claims to it by Ukraine and 
Russia. 
  The events developed swiftly. 
  "Everything began with the fact," the admiral says, "that L. 
Kravchuk summoned us three commanders of the districts and the 
Fleet and announced that henceforth he was commander in chief of 
forces of the Republic of Ukraine and that we along with the 
personnel, weapons, and equipment were being transferred to him. 
To put it mildly, this surprised me... There are 46 
nationalities in the Fleet..." 
  Then the admiral was ordered to administer the oath of 
allegiance to Ukraine to the Fleet before 10 January, and report 
to Kiev before 12 January the names of those who refused to take 
a second oath in their lives. 
  Kasatonov refused to transfer his sailors. "I said: I have 
already given a pledge of allegiance to Ukraine, as well as to 
Russia, Belorussia, Kazakhstan, and the other republics of the 
Union..." 
  He was immediately declared persona non grata in 
Kiev. But Kasatonov remained in Sevastopol. 
  Ukraine announced a blockade of the Fleet. There was no more 
fuel. They stopped paying the officers. They shut off the water 
to Sevastopol and raised prices. 
  On 30 January, in a telegram to the commander in chief of 
the 
CIS Combined Armed Forces, Marshal Ye. Shaposhnikov, and the 
commander in chief of the Navy, Admiral V. Chernavin, Leonid 
Kravchuk accused Kasatonov of a rude and scornful attitude 
toward a group of people's deputies and officials of the 
Ministry of Defense of Ukraine. The admiral had refused to 
receive them and forbid them to visit military ships, units, and 
subunits. The president of Ukraine emphatically demanded the 
removal of Admiral Kasatonov from his position. 
  As a result, Vice Admiral Kasatonov was drawn into politics 
very quickly, and now he can be compared perhaps with General 
Aleksandr Lebed, who tried with some success to calm down the 
sides in the Dniester conflict by using harsh political 
statements. The statements by Kasatonov, who during this time 
had become an admiral, are perhaps less graphic in nature, but 
to make up for it his actions are a constant annoyance for the 
Kiev leadership, beginning with the fact that he has refused to 
take the Ukrainian oath and ending with the fact that the 
Ukrainian representatives have been unable to establish control 
over the Fleet by force. 
  "In my opinion, someone in Ukraine sees the Black Sea Fleet 
as a commercial commodity which may be profitable to sell or, 
say, exchange for oil. Unfortunately, the professional approach 
absolutely is not visible here." "...Literally everyone is 
taking it upon themselves to judge the fate of the Fleet: 
agronomists, journalists, housewives... Legally, it is obvious: 
The Black Sea Fleet is a component part of the CIS forces. All 
my actions as commander of the Fleet stem from this..." 
  Admiral Kasatonov, so clearly opposing the Ukrainian 
leadership, was in quite a delicate situation, however. After an 
understanding was reached between Kravchuk and Yeltsin 
concerning the fate of the Black Sea Fleet--and on the principle 
of joint appointment of its commander--virtually none of the 
observers rated the chances of Igor Kasatonov staying in 
Sevastopol as high. 
  By decree of the president of the Russian Federation dated 5 
October 1992, Admiral Kasatonov was appointed first deputy 
commander in chief of the Russian Navy. 
  In October of that same year, he was nominated as a people's 
deputy of Russia to fill the position vacated in Krasnodar Kray 
by Vladimir Shumeyko, who was appointed first vice prime 
minister of the government of Russia. Among the two dozen 
challengers were the ataman of the Kuban Cossacks, former KGB 
General Oleg Kalugin, and co-chairman of the Party of Economic 
Freedom, Konstantin Borovoy. 
  He is married and has three children. 
<H5>  Konstantin Ivanovich Kobets </H5>
  Former state adviser for defense to the president of the 
Russian Federation and today chief military inspector of the 
Armed Forces of Russia, Army General Konstantin Ivanovich Kobets 
was born in 1939 to the family of a steel-worker. He graduated 
from the Kiev Military Communications School, the 
Electrotechnical and Polytechnical institutes, the Military 
Communications Academy, and the Military Academy of the General 
Staff. 
  In 1986, Kobets participated in the clean-up following the 
Chernobyl Nuclear Power Plant accident and in 1987 in 
restoration communications facilities in areas of Armenia 
destroyed by the earthquake. General Kobets is a professor and 
doctor of military sciences. From 1987 to 1991, Colonel-General 
Kobets was chief of the Signal Troops of the USSR Armed Forces 
and deputy chief of the General Staff. 
  In June 1990, residents of Chekhovskiy Rayon, Moscow Oblast, 
elected him people's deputy of the RSFSR. On 31 January 1991, 
the Presidium of the RSFSR Supreme Soviet confirmed him as 
chairman of the RSFSR Supreme Soviet Committee for Defense and 
State Security. Then, in March 1991, the committee was renamed 
the State Committee for Public Security and Cooperation with the 
USSR Ministry of Defense and the USSR Committee for State 
Security. Kobets remained its chairman. 
  At that time, the military and journalists writing about the 
Army believed that the appointment of Kobets as chairman of the 
committee was to be the compromise that could suit not only 
Boris Yeltsin but also, taking into account their long 
friendship, Minister of Defense Dmitriy Yazov. 
  According to informed sources, military service and studies 
have long linked Konstantin Kobets and Marshal Yazov. They 
maintained friendly relations right up until the events of 
August 1991, when Yazov joined the Emergency Committee, which 
separated the friends on different sides of barricades. 
  Opinions were also expressed that the main idea behind the 
appointment of Kobets was to use him to try to eliminate 
democratically oriented people in the military who, it was 
believed, had "ensconced themselves" in the committee, above all 
Deputy Chairman Vladimir Lopatin. Nevertheless, the general 
proved himself to be quite loyal on the committee. The conflict 
with democrats came down to a debate over whether the Defense 
Committee should be a military or civilian department. However, 
with the constant reorganizations and shake-ups taking place in 
the committee during its year of existence (of which workers of 
the committee accuse then-prime minister of Russia, Ivan 
Silayev, who experienced, in their view, an incomprehensible 
reluctance to deal with its problems), it does not seem possible 
to cite the merits of Kobets more or less noted by the public. 
  Nevertheless, General Kobets said this about himself: "If a 
Russian sits, he will not get to the end..." 
  On 19 August 1991, Boris Yeltsin, in addition to everything 
else, resubordinated to himself the troops stationed in Russia, 
appointing Kobets minister of defense. Thus, he became the first 
minister of defense of the Russian Federation--but only until 6 
September 1991. 
  After the failure of the putsch, after returning to Moscow, 
Mikhail Gorbachev, at the recommendation of Yeltsin, promoted 
Kobets to the rank of general of the army. At the same time, 
captive of the post-putsch moods, the USSR president made the 
decision to conduct military reform in the country, created a 
committee for preparing and conducting the reform, and assigned 
Kobets to head the committee. Thus, Kobets had his post in the 
Russian defense department taken away from him, which was given 
to the rising star of that time--the commander of the 
paratroopers who remained loyal, Pavel Grachev. According to 
available information, General Kobets and several of those close 
to him received expensive gifts as a reward for participating in 
cleaning up after the coup. They mention receiving automobiles 
for themselves and aides, as well as household appliances. In 
addition, it is claimed that his secretary, who absolutely did 
not demonstrate her worth during the three-day confrontation and 
calmly went home, when everyone was waiting for the night 
assault, received an order after the victory over the putsch, 
while there was nothing for the many real defenders. 
  Kobets himself mentioned his past friendship with General 
Kalinin, chief of the Moscow garrison during those days in 
August, and also said that he thought much about him, trying to 
outplay on an operational map the friend who had become a combat 
enemy. This probably made Kobets publicly express sympathy for 
those who ended up "on the other side:" "You talk to me about 
victory, and I sit and think: All the same, it is good that I am 
not the minister and that I did not may a career for myself in 
all this and did not take the blame to heart. Now everyone 
knows: The military of `that camp' are state criminals, and I 
know many of them personally, studied with them, and worked with 
some of them... It is hard for me to look their families in the 
eye. This is also a tragedy." 
  When the leaders of the union republics almost unanimously 
began to call for creating their own armed forces, Kobets and 
Shaposhnikov, the new USSR minister of defense, suggested to the 
president to strive to preserve a unified army, unified command 
and control of strategic nuclear forces, while preserving 
unified military-strategic planning, and a unified system of 
training military personnel with logistic support and budget 
financing. At that time, these views found support at the 
highest echelons of power and slowly began to be put into 
practice. 
  At the same time, Vladimir Lopatin, who was the deputy 
chairman under Kobets on the Committee for Defense Issues, 
assailed his former boss with harsh public criticism. He charged 
that the general, being chairman, did nothing to form the State 
Committee for Defense Issues and took no steps to clarify the 
role of top Army officers and generals in preparing and carrying 
out the coup d'etat, although he also headed the corresponding 
commission. Some remained convinced that Kobets at that same 
time did not forget about solving his personal problems. 
  On 25 March 1992, Decree Number 300 was signed, abolishing 
the service of the state adviser to the RSFSR president for 
defense issues "in connection with creation of the Ministry of 
Defense of the Russian Federation." Kobets was "reassigned to 
the Headquarters of the CIS Combined Armed Forces" and 
essentially ended up being removed from staff. 
  Beginning 4 April 1992, Kobets was deputy chairman of the 
State Commission for Forming the Ministry of Defense of the 
Russian Federation. He headed a group for determining a listing 
and status of troops stationed on the territories of states of 
the "near abroad." However, cynics in the Army say it is "a 
place for him until retirement." For what does this commission 
do today when its goals have been achieved and it no longer has 
any real powers any more?.. 
  Then in September he was appointed to the post of chief 
military inspector of Russia's Armed Forces... Journalists were 
interested in knowing if this appointment was a revival of the 
"paradise group" of the USSR Ministry of Defense. The military 
department, it is reported, gave a short and clear answer: "No!" 
<H5>  Andrey Afanasyevich Kokoshin </H5>
  In the second half of February 1992, the Democratic Russia 
and Military for Democracy movements, as well as representatives 
of the military-industrial complex and military science, among 
whom were the general director of the Mashinostroyeniye 
Scientific Production Association [NPO], G. Yefrimov, and the 
general designer of the Almaz NPO, B. Bunkin, and academicians 
Ye. Velikhov, Yu. Ryzhkov, and others recommended to Russian 
Federation President B. Yeltsin and the Supreme Soviet of the 
Russian Federation to appoint A. Kokoshin minister of defense of 
Russia. 
  On 3 April 1992, Boris Yeltsin appointed Andrey Kokoshin 
deputy minister of defense of the Russian Federation. Prior to 
this, he was deputy director of the USA and Canada Institute of 
the Russian Academy of Sciences and corresponding member of the 
Russian Academy of Sciences. 
  Andrey Afanasyevich Kokoshin was born on 26 October 1945 
into 
the family of an officer. He graduated from the instrument 
building faculty of the Moscow Higher Technical School imeni 
N.E. Bauman in 1969. After graduation he studied defense 
technologies and then worked on using them for peaceful 
purposes. In 1972, Kokoshin completed his graduate studies at 
the USA and Canada Institute of the USSR Academy of Sciences and 
in 1973 became a candidate and in 1982 a doctor of historical 
sciences. He became a professor in 1987. 
  He is a reserve officer. He has not served in the Army. 
  At the Academy of Sciences and the USA and Canada Institute, 
they say that Kokoshin is an "active social and political 
figure" who has been and is part of numerous initiatives and 
movements of scientists for disarmament and for strengthening 
peace. And this is indeed the case--today he is: Director of the 
Center for Conversion and Privatization at the USA and Canada 
Institute of the Russian Academy of Sciences, a member of the 
National Commission for Promoting Conversion, first deputy 
chairman of the Committee of Russian Scientists for Global 
Security. 
  In the 1980's, Andrey Kokoshin was among the main experts 
who 
participated in preparing disarmament treaties between the USSR 
and the United States and also other western countries. It is 
believed that he was one of the main developers of the military 
doctrine of the Warsaw Pact member-states adopted in 1987. He 
advanced and actively supported the "global double zero" 
position and defended the opinion that the "Krasnoyarsk radar 
did not go beyond the framework of the ABM Treaty." Then, 
however, Gorbachev had to revise positions, heeding the opinions 
of his western opponents. Kokoshin also had to change his 
opinion. 
  In general, many of those who known him maintain that 
Kokoshin is an extremely cautious person, which often makes him 
a "hostage to compromise." 
  Of his political views, the public knows only that he is an 
"advocate of ending the war between the `whites' and the `reds'." 
  During visits by Russian President B. Yeltsin to countries 
of 
Western Europe and the United States in late 1991 and early 
1992, A. Kokoshin was engaged in his usual job--he was head of a 
group of experts on military-political issues and issues of 
conversion. 
  Andrey Afanasyevich Kokoshin was the first Soviet scientist 
in late 1991 to address the U.S. Congress on questions of USSR 
military doctrine and military reform. 
  A.A. Kokoshin has authored a large number of articles and 
sections of 12 monographs on questions of military policy, 
conversion, and disarmament, published not only in the USSR but 
also in the United States, Japan, Germany, and other countries. 
  However, due to his cautious nature, he also has not 
strengthened his positions in the Grachev Ministry of Defense 
and, despite his lofty position, has no real power here. 
<H5>  Mikhail Petrovich Kolesnikov </H5>
  First deputy chief of the General Staff of Russia's Armed 
Forces, among military personnel, Colonel-General Mikhail 
Kolesnikov is considered a staff officer down to the bone. This 
is probably not correct, for as the right hand of the chief of 
the General Staff, General Dubynin, he has also passed through 
all levels of command positions, up to and including commanding 
an army. But it is also true that he has served in chief of 
staff positions at various levels off and on since 1977. 
  Mikhail Kolesnikov is a Siberian and was born on 30 June 
1939 
in the city of Yeysk, Krasnoyarsk Kray. He graduated from the 
Omsk Tank Technical School in 1959. He began serving in the 
troops in the position of platoon commander and then commanded a 
company and battalion. In 1975, after graduating from the 
Military Armored Troops Academy, he was appointed commander of a 
regiment. Beginning in 1977, he was chief of staff and deputy 
commander of a division, and in 1979 he was commander of a tank 
division. 
  He graduated from the Military Academy of the General Staff 
in 1983. He became a corps commander in 1983. He then commanded 
an army in the Transcaucasus Military District. From 1987 he was 
chief of staff and first deputy commander of the Siberian 
Military District. From 1988 he was chief of staff and first 
deputy commander in chief of the Southern Sector. From 1990 he 
was chief of the Main Staff and first deputy commander in chief 
of the Ground Forces. From 1991 he was deputy chief of the 
General Staff of the USSR Armed Forces. Here he was 
characterized both by superiors and subordinates as one of the 
most experienced staff workers of the Armed Forces of Russia. By 
Decree of the Russian Federation President dated 10 June 1992 he 
was appointed first deputy chief of the General Staff of the 
Armed Forces of the Russian Federation. 
  Judging from certain silent comments, Mikhail Kolesnikov is 
rather restrained with respect to the policy of the present 
government and, in general, of the democrats who took power 
after 21 August 1991. However, it is difficult to be specific in 
this regard, for he has limited himself to a discussion of 
almost purely Army problems in his few official speeches. 
<H5>  Georgiy Grigoryevich Kondratyev </H5>
  Colonel-General Georgiy Kondratyev, deputy minister of 
defense of Russia, was born on 17 November 1944 in the city of 
Klintsy, Bryansk Oblast. He graduated with honors from the 
Kharkov Tank Command School in 1965. In 1973, after graduating 
with honors from the Military Armored Troops Academy, he became 
chief of staff of a regiment. From 1974 he was a regiment 
commander, and from 1978 he was a deputy commander and then 
commander of a division. 
  He graduated with a gold medal from the Military Academy of 
the General Staff in 1985 and was appointed first deputy 
commander of an army in the Turkestan Military District. From 
1987 he was commander of an army. From 1989 he was first deputy 
commander of the Turkestan Military District and was the last 
commander of the Turkestan Military District. 
  He was appointed deputy minister of defense of the Russian 
Federation by Decree of the President of the Russian Federation 
dated 10 June 1992. 
<H5>  Anatoliy Mikhaylovich Kornoukov </H5>
  Lieutenant-General of Aviation Anatoliy Mikhaylovich 
Kornukov, commander of the Moscow Air Defense District, was born 
on 10 January 1942 in the city of Stakhanov, Lugansk Oblast. He 
graduated from the Chernigov Higher Military Aviation School for 
Pilots in 1964. 
  He began his service in the Air Defense Troops as a senior 
pilot. In 1974 he was commander of a fighter regiment. After 
graduating from the Military Command Academy of Air Defense 
imeni G.K. Zhukov in 1980, he was commander of a fighter 
division and then commander of a fighter corps. 
  He graduated from the Military Academy of the General Staff 
of the USSR Armed Forces in 1988. He successively held positions 
of first deputy commander of Fighter Aviation of the Air Defense 
Troops, first deputy commander of an air defense formation, and 
from 1989 was commander of an air defense formation. He was 
appointed commander of the Moscow Air Defense District in late 
September 1991. 
<H5>  Aleksandr Ivanovich Lebed </H5>
  He was born on 20 April 1950 in Novocherkassk, Rostov 
Oblast, 
into a working-class family. His father is Ivan Andreyevich, his 
mother is Yekaterina Grigoryevna. Although many men from the 
Lebed family had occasion to fight (his grandfather returned 
from the Great Patriotic War as a ranking noncommissioned 
officer and his father returned as a senior sergeant), Aleksandr 
was the first to become a professional military man. Later, two 
brothers followed in his footsteps. 
  He graduated from the Ryazan Higher Airborne Command School 
imeni Leninist Komsomol in 1973. (Prior to this, he had applied 
at the Armavir Aviation School, but each time was not accepted 
for health reasons). 
  For eight years, from 1973 to 1981, he commanded a platoon 
and then a company at his school. In other words, he was 
assigned a command back when he was still a cadet. You see, the 
most zealous graduates are left at the school. According to 
available information, A. Lebed was a platoon commander in the 
same company which was commanded at that time by Russia's 
present-day minister of defense, Pavel Grachev. 
  He participated in combat operations on the territory of the 
Republic of Afghanistan as commander of an airborne battalion in 
1981-1982. There is almost no information about his combat 
operations, but it is known that the battalion carried out 
primarily missions to intercept caravans with weapons. 
  He studied at the Military Academy imeni M.V. Frunze between 
1982 and 1985. After graduating, he commanded an airborne 
regiment in 1985-1986. 
  He was deputy commander in 1986-1988 and then commander of 
an 
airborne division in 1989-1991. 
  He was promoted to the rank of general in 1991 and appointed 
deputy commander of the Airborne Troops for combat training and 
military educational institutions. 
  On 19-20 August 1991, an airborne battalion of the Tula 
Division commanded by A. Lebed provided security for the Russian 
White House. According to other information (in the words of his 
boss, Pavel Grachev, in a careless interview following the 
putsch), Aleksandr Lebed was only conducting reconnaissance of 
the defense of the Russian parliament building. And not alone, 
but with the head of the elite group of KGB "Alfa commandos," V. 
Karpukhin, who had been given the order to storm the White 
House. According to the German newspaper DIE ZEIT, the plans of 
the plotters at that time was to direct OMON subunits to clear 
people from the road to the parliament building. After that, 
"Alfa" was to storm the building floor by floor, as it once did 
in Kabul, and in the end arrest Boris Yeltsin. Members of the 
"Alfa" group subsequently refused to storm the building, but at 
that time no one could have known this, and Karpukhin was 
accompanying Lebed and reconnoitering the approach routes to the 
White House, estimating the number of civilian defenders who had 
gathered around it, and recording it all on video. On 20 August, 
the chief of the Information Directorate of the USSR Ministry of 
Defense, Lieutenant-General V. Manilov, called Lebed's switch to 
the side of the White House "such low-grade rumors that it was 
awkward to comment on them" and stated that they "were totally 
unfounded." 
  There exists written eyewitness testimony: "At 1500 hours on 
19 August, General Lebed, carrying out the order of his 
commander (Grachev), demanded the chief of security and 
protection of government facilities of the Russian Federation 
"to remove the guards and leave the building by 1600 hours," 
otherwise "paratroops would shoot everyone." 
  However, there are also other versions circulating: 
According 
to the newspaper RESPUBLIKA, at one of the few meetings with 
USSR Minister of Defense Yazov, after seeing Lebed, Yazov 
spitefully asked: "What, you haven't shot yourself yet? I would 
have done so long ago if I were in your shoes..." Rumors 
circulated around Moscow about the suicide of General Lebed. 
  Those who have known Lebed for a long time characterize him 
as a soldier who adhered to the principle that "the Army is 
outside of politics and that the Army does not wish to be drawn 
into another round of public merrymaking." True, Lebed once was 
a CPSU member and at the constituient congress of the RSFSR 
Communist Party (June 1990) was elected a member of its Central 
Committee. 
  Still, less than a year went by after the putsch and the 
general was again "drawn into" politics: In June 1992 he was 
appointed commander of the 14th Army stationed in the Dniester 
region, where he replaced General Yu. Netkachev. This happened 
after the memorable action by Moldavian troops in Bendery, where 
many peaceful residents died in three days, and the Russian Army 
gazed upon the bloody mess with indifference. 
  Lebed became even more famous in the Dniester region than 
during the days following the putsch. This was primarily because 
he brought order to the troops of the 14th Army, which was 
recognized not only by command authorities and journalists but 
also by the soldiers themselves, who suddenly felt needed and 
responsible. He also "put in order" the Dniester region itself, 
where harsh, even brutal statements by the general and 
absolutely unambiguous measures cooled down both sides. When 
Kishinev failed to heed his warning about the "armed neutrality" 
of Russian troops, the general did not even stop at giving the 
order to make a missile and artillery strike against the 
Kitskansk bridgehead of the Moldavian Army. The effect, 
according to witnesses, "was quite impressive," and in the end 
the "hawk disguised as a swan," and the Moldavian press called 
the new commander of the army. He turned out the be the only 
person who was able to really start to separate the warring 
sides. This was also recognized. It is curious that even the 
left-wing press limited itself merely to recording the general's 
stated position with the directness and specificity inherent to 
him. For example: 
  "I can no longer regard Snegur, the legally, I emphasize 
legally, elected president of Moldova, as president... In place 
of a power leadership, he has organized a fascist state. And his 
clique is fascist..." 
  When he was in Kishinev, Lebed refused in an emphatic manner 
to shake the hand of the minister of defense of Moldova, Mirche 
Kostash, who had given the order to take Bendery: "The minister 
of defense is a general, or more precisely he is not a general, 
but a cannibal from DOSAAF." Such a stand by A. Lebed also 
raised his prestige among the Cossacks, who in August 1992 
elected him honorary member of the Black Sea Cossacks. 
  He was also unfriendly with the Russian leadership: 
  "They are destroying a power, everything is crumbling and 
being stolen before your eyes, and what kind of discipline can 
there be here? Any person, especially one wearing shoulder 
boards, must feel the power behind them. This is his mainstay. 
He then feels he is a citizen and disciplines himself 
internally. During the perestroyka years, all of this was lost. 
Now perestroyka has tightly entered its second 
phase--`shooting.' When the third phase of `roll call' will 
come, it is hard to say..." 
  "It is time to stop hanging around the swamp of a 
little-understood and little-intelligible policy..." 
  "We have done enough begging around the world, like goats 
begging for a carrot. It is time to get down to business. 
Observe supremacy of power. Let us get involved..." 
  The general's statements about the Russian leadership's 
policy with respect to its own army are also quite unprejudiced: 
A mass of equipment is being transferred to the Moldavian Army, 
and its requests are being poorly met. The general recalls that 
half a century ago, his father fought the Romanians at 
Stalingrad. 
  After such statements, A. Lebed was ordered not to meet with 
journalists, but the impassioned campaign anticipated by many to 
condemn the extremist general in the manner of those who once 
attacked Viktor Alksnis, who was much more restrained and who 
possessed no real power--this campaign did not take place. True, 
according to sources claiming to be informed, sanctions on 
Aleksandr Lebed were still ensued: By mid-July he still had not 
been confirmed by the president in his position. In addition, 
the decision promoting him to lieutenant-general was not 
signed--supposedly the only one on the list of those submitted. 
He did not receive this rank until three months later... 
  The general is married. His wife, Inna Aleksandrovna, was 
born in 1948 and is a housewife. They have three children--two 
sons and one daughter. Son Aleksandr, 20 years old (born in 
1972), and daughter Yekaterina, 19 years old (born 1973), are 
students at the Tula Polytechnical Institute. The youngest son 
Ivan, 13 years old (born 1979), is in school. As is typical for 
children of officers, he has changed schools eight times in 
eight years. 
  One of A. Lebed's brothers, Aleksey Ivanovich, a 37-year-old 
guards colonel, fought in Afghanistan. He has a combat order and 
medals. He commands an airborne regiment stationed in Kishinev 
which is presently being transferred to Abakan. 
<H5>  Vladimir Nikolayevich Lobov </H5>
  Strictly speaking, he is retired. But he played his part in 
developing the Russian Army if only by the fact that he became 
chief of the General Staff immediately after the events of 
August 1991 and planned to make it the central body of direct 
command and control of the troops and their preparation of 
combat operations (patterned after the Americans). 
  Vladimir Nikolayevich Lobov was born in 1935 in Bashkiriya 
to 
a large Russian peasant family. He served 37 years in the army 
and went from private to general of the army, doctor of 
sciences, and professor. 
  He graduated from secondary school and the Ryazan Artillery 
School simultaneously. He began his officer service in the 
Strategic Rocket Forces. 
  He graduated from the Military Academy imeni M.V. Frunze and 
the Military Academy of the General Staff. 
  He headed the Combined Armed Forces of the Warsaw Pact 
member-states, being first deputy chief of the General Staff of 
the USSR Armed Forces. In the fall of 1991, the Warsaw Pact 
ceased to exist without excessive fuss, and General Lobov was 
"exiled" to the chiefs of the Military Academy imeni M.V. 
Frunze. He worked there only two months and was involved in 
student recruitment. However, according to another version, he 
fell in disgrace for defending the idea of contacts between the 
military-political blocs of the Warsaw Pact and NATO. 
  Then he commanded the Central Asian Military District. In 
this capacity he experienced quite a bit of trouble when during 
the student unrest in Alma-Ata he refused to put troops on the 
streets of the city. But this incident taught him little: In 
August 1991, he refused to carry out the order of the putsch 
organizers to become military commandant of one of the areas of 
Moscow. He later said in this regard: "After being notified of 
the troops introduced into Moscow, I experienced a strong 
feeling of outrage and protest. This must not be done--tanks 
against unarmed people... Unfortunately, very many servicemen 
during those troubled days of August had to resolve an almost 
unresolvable moral contradiction. We must spare military people 
from such ordeals once and for all. We must spare them by law." 
  Nevertheless, the rather well-known G. Arbatov once 
remarked: 
"Lobov is a person who deep in his heart holds similar views to 
those of the coup plotters, in any case on questions of policy." 
  In general, Lobov was remembered by many as a military man 
with progressive views. Beginning in 1985, he expressed in 
various forms his disagreement with the policy of the previous 
army leadership. 
  Within the army, he is known as a supporter of progressive 
military doctrines and a modern professional and unified army. 
It is believed that his views on this point were completely 
confirmed by the Americans' actions during Operation Desert 
Storm. He is open to dialogue concerning reform with author 
collectives of all alternative projects and representatives of 
the republic. 
  He is noted for his education level (doctor of military 
sciences, candidate of historical sciences, professor) and also 
the breadth and professional nature of his views. 
  At the very start of perestroyka back in 1986, he proposed a 
program of fundamental reform of the army. But he was not heard. 
  The following can be considered the most typical of his 
statements: 
  "We caution against splitting up the armed forces into 
national armies." 
  "The more separate armed forces there are, the more real the 
danger of confrontation between republics." 
  "Let us be objective: The USSR and the United States are 
separated by a huge distance. Even if we ignore this 
circumstance, the land groupings located on their territories do 
not pose a real threat to us with their combat capabilities... 
We are watching to see that parity in the main area--nuclear 
arms--is not disrupted." 
  "The main task is to preserve the unified armed forces to 
protect the economic space which will take shape as a result of 
the new interrelations." 
  Immediately after the putsch, he was appointed chief of the 
General Staff of the USSR Armed Forces and was finally given an 
opportunity to implement his views. 
  In the three months that he was in the position of chief of 
the General Staff, Lobov, in his own view, had time to do very 
much: The Strategic Deterrence Forces were created; the 
transition to a professional army was prepared; the compulsory 
term of service was reduced to 18 months; steps were taken for 
social protection of officers; and much else... 
  He believed that there was no room for blind executors in 
the 
General Staff, especially in its top echelon. However, he 
himself could not find a common language with the command 
authorities of the armed forces. 
  Shaposhnikov made a complaint against him: "Recently, you 
have been writing much in the newspapers and magazines..." At 
the collegium he announced that Lobov had submitted a request to 
be relieved of his duties for health reasons (he could not be 
discharged for age or for duty discrepancies). However, it 
turned out that Lobov had refused to write the request himself. 
  According to Major Vladimir Lopatin, former deputy chairman 
of the State Committee of Russia for Defense Matters, this 
reflected the "troubling signs of dissension in the new 
leadership": "A triangle had taken shape: General of the Army 
Konstantin Kobets, General of the Army Vladimir Lobov, and 
Marshal of Aviation Yevgeniy Shaposhnikov. The contradictions 
revealed themselves openly for the first time at the Collegium 
of the Ministry of Defense on 17 September. It was a question of 
dividing up the functions of the Ministry of Defense and the 
General Staff. Each proposed his own model and, accordingly, 
more power for himself. In the end, these contradictions also 
led to the retirement of the chief of the General Staff." 
  The preparations to remove General Lobov were accomplished 
in 
deep secrecy (there were no rumors at all, which is rare for the 
General Staff). One week before retirement, the former chief was 
sent on a visit to England and was immediately removed from the 
position upon arriving. It is said that officials of the British 
Defense Ministry were most offended, having wasted much effort 
on organizing the first visit in history to Great Britain by a 
chief of the General Staff of the USSR Armed Forces. 
  On 14 December 1991, Ye. Shaposhnikov submitted a memorandum 
to President Gorbachev, in which he recommended discharging 
General Lobov from the ranks of the armed forces. 
  Shaposhnikov was victorious in the end--everything remained 
as before in the Ministry of Defense, and the General Staff also 
remained just one of its subdivisions. Pavel Grachev was the 
only winner in the end... 
  In general, 1991 turned out to be extremely unfortunate for 
Lobov: He was removed from office four times. He buried his 
mother and younger brother that same year. 
  At the constituent congress of the Russian fund "Rekviyem" 
[Requiem] (for the revival and preservation of spiritual values, 
the search and protection of monuments of history and military 
burials in Russia and abroad, development of friendship and 
cooperation of citizens of various countries), Lobov was elected 
its president in July 1992. 
<H5>  Vladimir Nikolayevich Lopatin </H5>
  Official references call him a "statesman of the Russian 
Federation. An irony of fate is the fact that the "statesman" 
has already been unemployed for several months now, and for the 
time being it is not apparent that anyone is concerned about the 
future fate of the former deputy chairman of the RSFSR State 
Committee for Defense Issues... 
  Vladimir Lopatin was born on 16 March 1960 in the settlement 
of Fomka, Yeniseyskiy Rayon, Krasnoyarsk Kray, into a 
working-class family. His father is Nikolay Alekseyevich 
Mayorov; his mother is Anna Dmitrevna Buzuyevskaya (Lopatina). 
  He graduated from the Achinsk Construction Technical School 
in 1977 and the Kurgan Higher Military-Political Aviation School 
in 1981. 
  He entered the armed forces in 1977. He was a Komsomol 
committee secretary at a repair and technical base of the 
Northern Fleet Air Forces 1981-1982; Komsomol committee 
secretary at a naval missile-carrying aviation regiment of the 
Northern Fleet Air Forces 1982-1983; senior instructor for 
Komsomol work of the political department of the Northern Fleet 
Air Forces 1983-1985; assistant for Komsomol work to the chief 
of the political department of a naval missile-carrying aviation 
division of the Northern Fleet Air Forces 1985-1987; and 
propagandist at an aviation-technical base of the Northern Fleet 
Air Forces 1987-1989. He was chief of the University of 
Marxism-Leninism at a garrison officer's club 1989-1990. 
Immediately following his election as a USSR people's deputy in 
1990, Vladimir Lopatin stated that he was a democratically 
oriented figure who is not afraid to criticize harshly the 
highest-ranking figures. This made him popular in democratic 
circles. It is known that when he was at the Congress of 
People's Deputies, Lopatin rejected the demand of then-chief of 
the General Staff Moiseyev to wear his uniform to the meetings: 
"We are not in formation here," stated Lopatin. 
  In 1990, Boris Yeltsin appointed him his deputy chairman of 
the RSFSR State Committee for Public Security and Interaction 
with the USSR Ministry of Defense and KGB, and in the absence of 
an appointed chairman, Vladimir Lopatin actually headed Russia's 
Defense Department for several months. 
  He stood out from those around him not only by his political 
engagement, but also, for the first time in recent years, by the 
clearly expressed program of military reform created by him 
together with several progressively thinking young military men. 
This earned him the rather open hatred of the top leadership of 
the armed forces at that time. 
  Vladimir Lopatin visited more than 10 foreign countries in 
the position of deputy chairman of the State Committee. It was 
he who was the first of the high-ranking Soviet military men to 
be received in Washington by U.S. Secretary of Defense R. 
Cheney. He was the first of our military to give reports in 
several parliaments outside the USSR. 
  During the days when it was still possible to preserve the 
Union, he visited all the republics, trying to organize military 
cooperation between them. 
  In 1990, he was discharged into the reserve in connection 
with his transfer to a job in a civilian agency without being 
left on active military service. 
  He was a USSR people's deputy from 1989 through January 
1992. 
In 1990, he was expelled in absentia from the ranks of the CPSU 
at a party meeting of the military unit where he was on the 
party register--as newspapers having the corresponding proof 
wrote--at the demand of USSR Minister of Defense Dmitriy Yazov 
and his political workers. 
  Subsequently, after President Gorbachev intervened into the 
situation, he was reinstated, and in that same year of 1990 he 
announced he was withdrawing from the ranks of the party. He 
developed the concept of military reform never implemented. 
  In September 1991, "as an exception," he was conferred a 
military rank two steps higher than his present rank "for 
services in defense of the White House." The cosmically high 
position upsurge of Major Lopatin met with approval in the 
democratic camp. But he himself did not approve of such a step, 
and in April 1992 he publicly turned down the promotion. 
  His has a wife, Yelena Leonidovna, born in 1963, and a son. 
<H5>  Leonid Sergeyevich Mayorov </H5>
  This name has acquired notoriety in conditions of the 
unsettled disputes with the Baltic states with respect to the 
fate of the Russian Army on their territories: Colonel-General 
Leonid Mayorov was appointed commander of the Northwestern Group 
of Forces stationed in the Baltic in July 1992 (in place of 
Colonel-General V.A. Mironov). 
  Mayorov was born on 22 July 1941 in Georgiyevsk, Stavropol 
Kray. He graduated from the Military Motor Vehicle Command 
School in 1961, the Military Academy of Rear Services and 
Transportation in 1972, and the Military Academy of the General 
Staff in 1986. 
  Mayorov passed through all levels of command: He commanded a 
company, division, and army. In 1976, he was appointed chief of 
staff and deputy commander of a motorized rifle division, and 
three years later he became division commander. He served in the 
Transbaykal Military District, also as chief of staff and then 
as commander of an army. From 1981 and until recently he was 
chief of staff of the Volga-Ural Military District. This draws 
to himself the attention of many columnists, for such a fact 
signifies service under the direct command of General Makashov, 
known for his conservative communist views and his active 
non-acceptance of the democratic regime. 
  Suppositions about the "Afghan" past of the new commander 
were not confirmed. Colonel-General Mayorov had to serve abroad, 
but only in Mongolia. He also was involved in the withdrawal of 
Soviet troop from this country. 
  The colonel-general realistically views his role in the 
Baltic: "The group of forces today have ended up at the junction 
of acute political interests." Hence, the increased attention to 
himself. At the same time, he assesses quite critically the 
position of the Baltic leaders: "Not a word about the fact that 
during the postwar years these very troops helped restore the 
national economy, disarmed tens of thousands of mines, and build 
hundreds of homes, dozens of nurseries, and stores..," but at 
the same time "the passage of legislative acts restricting the 
activities of the troops, seizure of military facilities with 
the use of armed formations..." 
  General Mayorov, according to experts, nevertheless 
demonstrates a quite moderate approach to solving the problems 
with the Baltic states. He tries to find non-conflict junctions 
between the Russian Army and local authorities. One of his 
proposals is to create joint groups with local authorities with 
rights of some kind of "joint coordinating group." True, the 
proposal has not yet been accepted by the Baltic side, but this 
does not disturb the reputation established by Mayorov in the 
troops as one of the intelligent politicians in the army. 
  It is curious that this is already the third politically 
notable military man from the "nest of Makashov"... 
<H5>  Albert Mikhaylovich Makashov </H5>
  "Patriotism is the instinct of self-preservation of a 
nation." These words have become the motto of one of Russia's 
most politically active military men. It seems that he truly 
believes in them. But many are troubled by the fact that the 
general's patriotism has a very red shade... 
  Albert Makashov was born on 12 July 1938 in the village of 
Levaya Rossosh, Voronezh Oblast, to a Cossack family. His father 
was a military man and served in the cavalry and the mechanized 
troops. He ended the war as a senior lieutenant. His mother, a 
nurse, from the Old Believers, named her son in honor of Saint 
Dmitriy Salunskiy, but under pressure from people's physician 
Natalya Vasilyevna, who raised the mother, recorded the name of 
the future general as Albert in honor of one of the characters 
from George Sand's novel "Consuelo." 
  Makashov graduated from the Voronezh Suvorov School, which 
he 
entered at the age of 12. He graduated from the Tashkent Higher 
Combined-Arms Command School in 1960. He then graduated from the 
Academy imeni M.V. Frunze and the Military Academy of the 
General Staff of the USSR Armed Forces, both with gold medals. 
  He began his service as a commander of a reconnaissance 
platoon and was commander of a division reconnaissance company, 
chief of intelligence of a tank regiment, and commander of a 
battalion, regiment, division, and an army. 
  He served in the Transcaucasus, Kiev, and Ural military 
districts and in the Western Group of Forces. 
  In December 1988, being a lieutenant-general, he was 
commandant of a special area of Armenia that was subjected to an 
earthquake. To accelerate assistance to Armenian cities, the 
government allocated considerable money, and up to 20,000 
personnel, 770 pieces of engineering equipment, and 1,500 motor 
vehicles were transferred to General Makashov. 
  Besides the purely economic work, Makashov was also 
entrusted 
with functions of monitoring the political situation. At that 
time the Nagornyy Karabakh conflict continued to flare between 
Armenia and Azerbaijan. General Makashov, appointed military 
commandant of Yerevan by decree of the Presidium of the Supreme 
Soviet of Armenia, was given additional powers. The "Karabakh 
Committee," an Armenian organization advocating the annexation 
of the Nagornyy Karabakh Autonomous Oblast to Armenia, was 
banned. Seven of its eleven leaders were arrested. "The main 
task is to restore citizens' constitutional rights. Unsanctioned 
demonstrations, rallies, strikes, and spectacles have been 
banned. The military has control of transportation, 
communications, mail, telegraph, and other spheres of 
life-support for the city with a population of one million," 
TASS reported during those days. 
  The following was written about Makashov: "Albert 
Mikhaylovich sleeps and eats in his office, leaving it only to 
check the posts which are assigned throughout Yerevan. Officers 
who have known Makashov for a long time claim that during this 
time their general has turned gray and declined in health--such 
tremendous responsibility." 
  From January 1989 to September 1989 A.M. Makashov commanded 
Ural Military District. Then for two years, from September 1989 
to September 1991, after combining and enlarging the military 
districts, he was commander of the Volga-Ural Military District. 
  Makashov spoke at the 19th All-Union Party Conference in the 
summer of 1989. 
  When General Makashov rose to the speaker's rostrum, there 
were few who knew his name. He left it as a person to whom the 
attention of the Soviet and foreign press was riveted. His 
speech was remembered by many as frankly "Bolshevik." In it he 
accused the Soviet leadership at that time of intentionally 
breakup of the country and of retreating from the basic 
principles of the CPSU. For many his image was that of a stern 
military dictator. 
  Evaluating his speech at the 19th Party Conference 
("Communists of the Army and Navy are outrages by the inaction 
of the CPSU Central Committee, Politburo, and Government with 
respect to their protectors, to those who are persecuting their 
soldiers"), he said that he deliberately called fire on himself 
and achieved his set goal. "It has become clear to everyone that 
the one who runs down the Army wants its collapse." 
  In August 1990, western information agencies reported that 
they had information that General Makashov had traveled to Iraq 
and was connected with developing Iraqi plans to capture Kuwait. 
However, the Ministry of Defense categorically denied this 
report. 
  In 1989, Makashov was elected a USSR people's deputy. 
  At the Constituent Congress of the Russian Communist Party, 
remembered for the wild discussions about the place of 
communists in governing the country and the role of the 
Communist Party in the state, Makashov was elected a member of 
the Central Committee. 
  On 13 May 1991, the leadership of several military units and 
labor collectives of the Volga-Ural Military District and the 
Sverdlovsk Higher Political Tank and Artillery School put 
forward and began collecting signatures for the nomination of 
A.M. Makashov for the position of president of the RSFSR. On 
that same day, the general agreed and entered the election 
campaign, naming the Marxist economist V. Sergeyev as his 
candidate for vice-president. 
  It took him only two days to collect more than 100,000 
signatures to register as a candidate for president of Russia. 
More than 20,000 of the signatures came from Yekaterinburg, a 
city where Yeltsin's positions are traditionally strong. 
  At campaign rallies, the general gave unflattering marks to 
the "hasty and rash withdrawal of our troops from Eastern 
Europe," the presidential elections in Georgia, and conversion 
of the defense complex. The challenger expressed the opinion 
that the USSR "was artificially led into an impasse," which he 
proposed getting out of with the aid of a program developed by 
him that called for a "reasonable combination of a planned and 
market economy" on the "territory of a unified and indivisible 
RSFSR within the 1945 borders" and revival of the "state right 
to foreign trade, patriotism, and traditions of all peoples of 
the RSFSR." This program was supported by some servicemen and 
also veterans who saw a danger in the restructuring course of 
Gorbachev and the dangerous, in their view, radicalism of Boris 
Yeltsin. The West German magazine DER SPIEGEL wrote during those 
days: "...Colonel-General Albert Makashov is the favorite of the 
ultra-right and a fervent opponent of Gorbachev. He advocates 
preserving Russian within the 1945 borders, `Sovietization of 
the economy,' and the `spiritual heritage of the Cossacks' and 
opposes foreign capital and also cosmopolitans, parasites, and 
exploiters." 
  The general was unsuccessful in the elections--he received 
3.74 percent of the votes. Nevertheless, Makashov gained great 
notoriety in Russian communist and Russian patriotic circles. 
The newspaper RUSSKIY VESTNIK wrote this about him: "This is a 
political leader who has toiled his entire life in the 
provinces. This is his main support. He has not been spoiled by 
the school of bureaucratic nomenklatura games." 
  In August 1991, Makashov ended up among those who actively 
supported the GKChP. It was reported that he even sent a 
telegram in support of all the decisions of the putsch 
organizers, and he nearly tried to bring jurisdictional troops 
to combat readiness. In any event, after Gorbachev's return to 
Moscow, as an active accomplice of the GKChP, Makashov was sent 
into retirement seven years before the official retirement age 
for a pension. Therefore, the general considers himself not in 
the reserve, but in disgrace. 
  The USSR broke up. After this, the name of the general, as 
it 
seemed, disappeared from the newspapers. However, in early 1992, 
it reappeared on their pages. He spoke at a rally on 23 
February. Then in late February-early March he was part of an 
organizational committee for convening an "Extraordinary 
Congress of the USSR People's Deputies." The Congress was held 
on 17 March 1992 in the settlement of Voronovo near Moscow, 
where a small group (about 200 people) of former deputies called 
for the revival of the USSR and repeated the thesis of their 
adherence to the ideas of the CPSU. 
  The general stated his opinion on nearly all topics of the 
country's life, but in particular devoted many words to the 
armed forces. He spoke out against: 
  --a completely hired army: "Today only four countries-the 
United States, Canada, Great Britain, and Luxembourg--have hired 
armies. History has shown that no hired army has existed long or 
defeated a serious enemy." 
  --depoliticization: "The first political bodies in the 
Russian Army appeared under Kerenskiy. When they say it is 
necessary to depoliticize the army, I see a desire to destroy 
one of the strongest aspects of our reality. You cannot have a 
neutral army. If you drive the party (CPSU) from the armed 
forces, another ideology will instantly take its place." 
  --withdrawal of troop from Eastern Europe: "Take just our 
district. The waiting list for housing has reached 9,000 officer 
not counting those arriving... In addition, new troop deployment 
areas have not been prepared to receive equipment..." 
  --capitalism: "We will not have Swedish, German, or French 
capitalism. Russian capitalism will have a terrible, inhuman 
face..." 
  Today the general often reiterates: "I favor dictatorship, 
but dictatorship of law. And here I am an advocate of stern 
measures and strong power. Otherwise we are heading for a 
disaster..." 
  On the whole, the general's political service record can be 
set forth in the following manner: Participant in the Initiative 
Congress of Communists of Russia (April, July, and October 
1990). Delegate to the Constituent Congress of the Communist 
Party of the RSFSR (June 1990) and the 28th Congress of the CPSU 
(July 1990). Was a participant in the First (April 1991, in 
Leningrad) and the Second (July 1991, in Moscow) Congresses of 
the Communist Initiative Movement. In the presidential election 
on 12 June 1990 he ran for the post of RSFSR president (A.A. 
Sergeyev for vice-president). Delegate to the Constituent 
Congress of the Russian Communist Workers' Party (in 
Yekaterinburg, 23-24 November 1991), where he was elected member 
of the Central Committee and then member of the Organizational 
Bureau of the Central Committee. After being discharged from the 
ranks of the Soviet Army (October 1991), he became actively 
involved in political activities. He was one of the sponsors of 
convening the Sixth Congress of USSR People's Deputies (March 
1992) at which he was elected member of the Standing Presidium 
of the Congress. 
  In October 1992, Makashov joined the Organizational 
Committee 
of the National Salvation Front, soon banned by President B. 
Yeltsin. 
  The general is married to Lyudmila Maksimova. They have 
three 
children and five grandchildren. Their son is a serviceman. 
  The general's hobbies include driving an automobile. He 
began 
driving back in 1956 in an American Dodge. He drives virtually 
all types of civilian and combat vehicles (just as he shoots all 
types of weapons). He bought his Volga back when he was serving 
in Germany. 
  He drinks only on holidays, mainly Russian vodka, although 
at 
the two academies he liked wine and even had the nickname of 
"Dry Wine." He quit smoking after being wounded, back when he 
was a captain. 
  He reads many books on the history of Russia. He prefers the 
novels by Valentin Pikul. Of the classical writers, he admires 
Shakespeare. 
  Although, in his words, he is totally tone deaf, he admires 
Grieg and considers Boris Godunov the model of operatic art. He 
loves folk music and Cossack songs. 
<H5>  Valeriy Ivanovich Mironov </H5>
  Colonel-General Valeriy Mironov, deputy minister of defense 
of the RSFSR, was born on 19 December 1943 in the city of Moscow. 
  He is from the family of a serviceman. He lost his parents 
early. He has worn shoulder boards since 1955, when he was 
accepted at a Suvorov School. After that, he enrolled in the 
Moscow Higher Combined-Arms Command School imeni Supreme Soviet 
of the RSFSR and became a so-called "Kremlin cadet." He began 
his officer service in 1965 in the usual way--in the position of 
platoon commander and then company commander. 
  He held command and staff positions without missing a single 
one. "Nothing extraordinary--neither abrupt upsurges nor 
patronage of influential persons." 
  In 1973, after graduating from the Military Academy imeni 
M.V. Frunze, he was appointed regiment chief of staff and deputy 
commander. He was a regiment commander in 1975, deputy division 
commander in 1977, and division commander in 1979. 
  As he says: "Behind me are the garrisons of the Turkestan 
Military District and the Arctic. Kushka and Pechenga. Heat and 
cold." 
  His division was among the first dropped into Afghanistan in 
December 1979. 
  He graduated from the Military Academy of the General Staff 
in 1984. He was first deputy commander of an army in 1984 and 
first deputy commander of the Leningrad Military District in 
1989. He was commander of the Northwestern Group of Forces 
(previously the Baltic Military District) in 1991. In this 
position, he participated in a large number of negotiations with 
hard-line Baltic politicians and, in the opinion of observers, 
proved to be a pretty good diplomat, although not adapting to a 
changing situation too quickly. The withdrawal of Russian troops 
from the Baltic states also began under him. It took place in an 
exceptionally organized manner. 
  Mironov says: "I do not consider myself to be an aggressive 
person, but I do not agree with the turning the other cheek." 
  He was appointed deputy minister of defense of the Russian 
Federation by decree of the Russian Federation President dated 
10 June 1992. He is responsible for personnel and work with 
personnel. 
  He has two children. His daughter is preparing for work as a 
teacher, and his son is in school. 
<H5>  Aleksandr Gennadyevich Mochaykin </H5>
  He was born in 1948 in Ukraine. His mother is Ukrainian and 
was a prisoner in a Nazi concentration camp, where she was 
liberated by her future husband and his father. He graduated 
from school in Nagornyy Karabakh. He is fluent in Ukrainian and 
Azerbaijani. He worked at the Ilichevskiy Shipyards (Odessa 
Oblast). After compulsory service in the Tank Troops, he 
enrolled in a military school. 
  After school, he served in the ranks of lieutenant to 
captain 
first rank on submarines in the Northern Fleet. His last 
position was assistant commander of a submarine division for 
work with personnel. He participated in a number of long-range 
cruises and served in remote garrisons. 
  At the All-Army Officer's Assembly on 17 January, he was 
elected to the Coordination Council of Officer Assemblies of the 
CIS Combined Armed Forces. He visited the Dniester Region and 
the Nakhichevan Autonomous Oblast in this capacity. He sees the 
council's task as preserving the unity of the officer corps of 
the former USSR Armed Forces without getting involved in 
politics. 
  He is considered a representative of right-wing conservative 
circles in the army. 
  He is married with two children. One of his sons is serving 
in the Ministry of Internal Affairs. 
<H5>  Yuriy Maksimovich Netkachev </H5>
  The general, until recently a regular division commander, 
during the course of the Moldavian-Dniester conflict became a 
notable political figure, primarily because it was clear to all 
parties involved or not involved in the clash: The only serious 
combat force--the 14th Army--was in his hands and controlled by 
him. Hence another role: The role of commander who, it is 
possible, with all his strength kept the Army from breaking up 
into armed detachments fighting for different fronts--and ended 
up in the wrong... 
  Yuriy Netkachev was born on 10 April 1945. 
  He graduated from the Military Academy of the Armored Troops 
in 1976 and the Military Academy of the General Staff in 1988. 
  In January 1992, he was appointed commander of the 14th 
Army, 
after the previous commander, Lieutenant-General G. Yakovlev 
(who, they say, enjoyed prestige), was removed from this 
position at the demand of Moldavia for his sympathies to the 
"separatists," that is, for the Dniester region. 
  Netkachev, arriving from Belorussia, took his place. He 
immediately ordered an armored door to be placed on his hotel 
room... Then, on the order of Netkachev, combat equipment was 
disabled. He drove to the combat engineers with his "spetsnaz" 
company, soldiers and officers were driven into the barracks, 
and "spetsnaz" mined all military supply depots. 
  The general immediately stated that "soldiers of the 14th 
Army will never fight against their own people and will not 
participate in any conflicts." He himself cited one of the 
reasons for this peaceful nature: "I do not plan to turn the 
army that the people have entrusted to me into a mountain of 
corpses." 
  Strange as it may seem, the idea of saving soldiers' and 
officers' lives and neutrality of the army enjoyed little 
popularity in the troops, who long ago had put down roots along 
both sides of the Dniester. Many soldiers of the 59th Division 
transferred to the guards and the "Dniester" Battalion. The 
battalion in Parkany was transferred to the jurisdiction of the 
PMR [Dniester-Moldovan Republic] at almost full strength. At the 
same time, the Moldovans also actively undertook privatization 
of the army: As was reported, it was deprived of two out of 
three divisions and most of the artillery. A surface-to-air 
missile brigade also "left" for Kishinev. 
  By July 1992, all that was left of the army was the 
headquarters, which had under its command the 59th Guards 
Motorized Rifle Division, engineer and logistic support units, 
and units of district and central subordination. Officers 
bitterly joked: You can build an army in front of the army 
commander's door. 
  Having been educated at the Academy of the Armored Troops 
and 
the Military Academy of the General Staff, Major-General 
Netkachev meanwhile continued to balance on a razor blade, 
trying to maintain neutrality between the two sides. It seems he 
actually considered the primary purpose of his stay in the 
Dniester region to be to prevent the troops from being drawn 
into combat operations. "The 14th Army is subordinate to the CIS 
and will not fulfill any demands of the Dniester Republic," he 
stated in March of that year to the United Council of Labor 
Collectives of Tiraspol and the local women's committee, which, 
having actually taken him prisoner, offered to send the army's 
personnel and combat equipment to protect the borders of the 
Dniester region. On the other hand, the commander was also 
subjected to stiff pressure on the part of Kishinev, demanding 
he withdraw his troops from the territory of Moldavia and 
transfer their combat equipment to the republic. 
  It must be said that in March 1992, the general was 
officially notified that the women's strike committee of the 
Dniester region headed by Galina Andreyevna, well-known in these 
parts and whom the people called "admiral," had sentenced him to 
death by hanging for his efforts to maintain the neutrality. 
Somewhat later, on 25 March, he received a letter from the 
People's Front of Moldova, in which he was also promised that he 
would not die from natural causes. 
  It was difficult to take this as a joke, especially after 
the 
report of the arrest of Igor Smirnov, the Dniester president, in 
the very center of Kiev by special services of Moldova and the 
kidnapping of General Yakovlev, former commander of the 14th 
Army, in Odessa Oblast. 
  In military circles, Yuriy Netkachev is considered an honest 
servant who by fate has ended up between two millstones. 
Observers note, however, that up to now he has found a way out 
of the difficult situation by using the following formula: The 
conflict between Moldavia and the Dniester Republic can be 
resolved "only by both sides compromising." At the same time, he 
sometimes reminded that the "army cannot remain an outside 
observer while blood is being shed on the land where it is 
stationed." 
  On 19 May 1992, virtually the first day after Pavel Grachev 
became minister of defense of Russia, it is asserted, he sent a 
telegram to Yu. Netkachev (true, the Ministry of Defense denies 
its existence) which stated: Since "it is Russian land in the 
Dniester region and the situation has worsened, we must protect 
it by all means and methods available." This somewhat 
invigorated the general. 
  Yuriy Netkachev inferred that he is one of those commanders 
who is not inclined to "turn the other cheek." For example, he 
stated to the chairman of the Supreme Soviet of the Dniester 
Republic, G. Marakutsa, that the army reserves the right to 
return its weapons "using force and available means." But during 
the course of subsequent events, it turned out that the general 
did not have enough resolve to use force in another regard--to 
stop the slaughter in Bendery in late June 1992, which left a 
nearly indelible mark of his name in the troops. 
  General Lebed, who replaced him in Tiraspol, stated harshly 
that Netkachev had committed almost a military offense, 
permitting the murder of innocent people in plain view of the 
army. 
<H5>  Valentin Nikolayevich Panichev </H5>
  He was born in 1941 in Vologda Oblast. After graduating from 
school, he worked at an experimental aircraft plant. He 
graduated from the law faculty of Leningrad State University in 
1967 and since that time has been in bodies of the procuracy. He 
was the procurator in Pskov and Rostov oblasts and is a state 
legal adviser third class. In the spring of 1992, he was 
appointed chief of the Main Administration for Monitoring 
Observance of Laws on the Armed Forces of the General Procuracy 
of the Russian Federation--chief military procurator. 
  He has never served in the Army and has had no connection 
with it. 
  "Konek" is an "investigative organization." It is notorious 
for the fact that it pled the much talked about "Rostov 
case"--the search for the maniac-murderer Chikatillo. 
  In Panichev's opinion, "in the Army there is a total lack of 
a qualified preliminary investigation service, a criminal 
investigation type operational-investigation service, and OBKhSS 
[Department for Combating the Embezzlement of Socialist Property 
and Speculation]. 
<H5>  Viktor Alekseyevich Prudnikov </H5>
  Deputy minister of defense of the USSR and commander in 
chief 
of the Air Defense Troops, Viktor Alekseyevich Prudnikov was 
born on 4 February 1939 in Rostov-on-Don to a large family (nine 
children). He was left without a mother at an early age. 
  He enrolled in a special school of the Air Force at the age 
of 14. He enrolled in the Armavir Military Aviation School for 
Pilots at the age of 17 and graduated in 1959. He began service 
in the troops as an instructor pilot at a training air regiment. 
He graduated from the Military Air Academy imeni Yu.A. Gagarin 
in 1967 and was appointed deputy commander of an air squadron. 
  Prudnikov has been in the Army 38 years already. He has 
served on the western border, in the Far East, and in Siberia. 
He was promoted early to lieutenant colonel and colonel. 
  He was commander of an air squadron in 1968. He was a 
fighter 
regiment deputy commander for flight training in 1970 and was 
appointed regiment commander a year later. He was deputy 
commander of a division in 1973, commander of an air defense 
division in 1975, and first deputy commander of a separate air 
defense army in 1978. 
  He graduated from the Military Academy of the General Staff 
in 1981 and was appointed first deputy commander and in 1983 
commander of a separate air defense army. From 1989 through 31 
August 1991 he commanded the Moscow Air Defense District, after 
which he became air defense commander in chief of the USSR. 
Viktor Prudnikov was appointed air defense commander in chief of 
Russia in August 1992. 
  According to colleagues, he is a man of "exceptional honesty 
and decency." 
  During his free time he swims and plays tennis. He goes to 
the theater whenever he can. 
  He is trying to raise his two sons to be "honest, 
industrious, and decent people." His oldest son enrolled in a 
higher civil aviation flight school, but his health failed. "We 
lost our youngest son to an untimely death." 
<H5>  Aleksandr Vladimirovich Rutskoy </H5>
  The charged atmosphere of perestroyka in Russia has drawn 
out 
a number of colorful figures who have become noticeable images 
on its political scene. 
  One of the most astonishing upsurges--even against the 
background of our present patron-president's career, rich with 
incidents--was made by Russia's vice president, Aleksandr 
Rutskoy. Malicious tongues among political opponents sometimes 
call him "unsinkable," although for the sake of accuracy this 
epithet would be more fitting for Boris Yeltsin. As far as 
Aleksandr Rutskoy is concerned, he would more likely be 
considered "fireproof." He not only was shot down twice in an 
aircraft in Afghanistan, not only returned to flying after being 
grounded due to a wound, and with a promotion, but the most 
important thing--he retains an astonishing political vitality 
despite the fact that continually drawn into the constant flow 
of political battles. What is more, according to his own 
testimony, true, he maintains friendly relations with the 
president, although he has repeated subjected Boris Yeltsin's 
policies to harsh criticism. 
  In short, considered by opponents to be among the camp of 
fanatical Russian "national-patriots" and evoking the irritation 
of professional democrats by his ties with the 
military-industrial complex, giving many the impression of a 
"dashing colonel" by his manners, Vice President Rutskoy is 
considered among politologists devoted in detail as one of the 
most mysterious figures in Russian politics. 
  Aleksandr Vladimirovich Rutskoy was born in 1947 in the city 
of Kursk. He grew up in a professional military family. His 
grandfather served in the Railroad Troops; his father was a tank 
crew member and served the entire war from the first to the last 
day and fought his way to Berlin. He was a lieutenant colonel in 
the reserve and died in early 1991 at the age of 67. The Rutskoy 
family, judging by everything, was devoted to the communist 
ideal: His father was a CPSU member for 47 years and his 
grandfather for 52 years. 
  Aleksandr Rutskoy has two brothers: Vladimir, also a pilot, 
and younger brother Mikhail who graduated from the Academy of 
the Ministry of Internal Affairs in 1991 and became a senior 
criminal investigation agent in Kursk. 
  Aleksandr Vladimirovich Rutskoy graduated with honors from 
the Barnaul Higher Military Aviation School for Pilots, the 
Military Air Academy imeni Yu.A. Gagarin, and in 1990 the 
Military Academy of the General Staff. 
  He was involved with the flying club back when he was a 
schoolboy. He worked as a metalworker at an aircraft plant. He 
was drafted in 1965 and was a rifleman-radio operator in the 
rank of sergeant. He demonstrated leadership qualities back in 
flight school. He drew well; once in a school wall newspaper he 
drew himself in general's shoulder boards. After graduating from 
military school, he served as an instructor pilot at the 
Borisoglebsk Aviation School imeni V.P. Chkalov. 
  After graduating from the Military Air Academy, he was 
assigned to the Group of Soviet Forces in Germany. In 1984, 
Rutskoy was assigned a quite honored and very promising mission 
in terms of his career: To form a regiment for new aircraft 
(young pilots just out of school, average age 22). "In one year 
I trained kids to the Class II level," Rutskoy recalled with 
pride later. For some reason, those under his care nicknamed 
their boss "Lobachevskiy." 
  He participated in combat operations in Afghanistan in 
1985-1986 and 1988. He flew 428 combat sorties. He was grounded 
for health reasons after being seriously wounded in 1986, but 
returned to Afghanistan one and a half years later in the 
position of deputy commander of air forces of the 40th Army. In 
1988 he was awarded the title of Hero of the Soviet Union. 
  Rutskoy himself had this to say about his Afghanistan 
adventures: 
  "I was sent to Afghanistan in 1985. This was the only 
regiment that did not lose a single pilot. We were the only ones 
who began to fight in the Afghan mountains. But the regiment was 
disbanded. 
  "I headed another regiment, totally untrained. We lost seven 
pilots in three months. Then I got shot down in the vicinity of 
Jawar. I had a fractured spine and was wounded in the arm. After 
I got out of the hospital, I was suspended from flying duties 
and assigned as deputy chief of the Combat Training Center in 
Lipetsk. In 1988, they proposed that I return to Afghanistan as 
deputy commander of the 40th Army air forces. 
  "In 1988, the enemy began to receive surface-to-surface 
missiles for shelling garrisons. I created a squadron of 
ground-attack aircraft, recruiting the best pilots. Then, in the 
vicinity of Khost I was shot down by F-16 fighters from the 
Pakistani Air Force, and the wind carried me over Pakistan. I 
shot back for five days and avoided pursuit. I was wounded 
again. I had a contusion and was captured. I was a prisoner for 
1.5 months and was later exchanged. I weighed 48 kg at that 
time." 
  The latest adventure of the indefatigable colonel caused a 
great echo. Only a very narrow circle of people know or at least 
assume what the military leader could do "in the vicinity of 
Khost" in a position whose duties did not call for direct 
participation in ground-attack or fighter operations. In the 
end, Rutskoy was exchanged for a Pakistani spy, after which he 
returned to the USSR. 
  The combat glory and popularity of the colonel considerably 
eased the way for him in 1990 to the RSFSR deputy mandate from 
one of the electoral districts in Kursk. In his election 
campaign, he spoke basically from strictly communist positions 
and defended the unity of the USSR, but the following passages 
could be considered most typical: 
  "The people have the Army--an integral element of the 
socialist social organism. For many generations of Soviet 
people, military service became a school for instilling 
responsibility, courage, and patriotism and taught occupying an 
active position in life. The clean air of perestroyka today is 
promoting an upsurge in duty and political activeness of people 
wearing the uniform. The reaction of the Army and Navy community 
to negative phenomena is becoming increasingly sharp, and an 
atmosphere of mutual respect, openness, businesslike criticism, 
and self-criticism is becoming more noticeably established in 
military collectives. I see this as the key to a further 
increase in combat readiness of the armed forces and in their 
prestige." 
  "In 1984, the Soviet Union represented a great power, its 
Army a mighty force that was factor of peace stability on the 
planet. Everything that occurred from then on, from 1985, under 
the name of perestroyka--this was the most genuine collapse..." 
  During the 1989 election campaign, radical democrats 
sometimes called him a "fascist." 
  Rutskoy became a member of the RSFSR Supreme Soviet, where 
he 
was chairman of the deputy group Communists for Democracy and 
also chairman of the RSFSR Supreme Soviet Committee for Affairs 
of Invalids, Veterans of War and Labor, and Social Protection of 
Servicemen and Their Family Members. 
  He was demobilized after being elected RSFSR people's 
deputy: 
"I have been detached to the Supreme Soviet." 
  Further activities of Aleksandr Rutskoy are closely linked 
to 
politics, particularly politics of the Communist Party. When the 
Old Square [Staraya Ploshchad] made the decision to create the 
Russian Communist Party, Rutskoy became one of the most active 
members of its leadership. He has been a member of its Central 
Committee since 1990. 
  True, already then his parliamentary activities evoked 
dissatisfaction of astute Kursk veterans. They accuse the 
colonel of "failing to keep a promise to the voters to support 
the CPSU" and also that he "today defends the positions of the 
Democratic Party, which contradicts his election assurances." 
  According to informed political observers, the RSFSR 
Communist Party one way or another was doomed to split due to 
the excessive contradictions that had accumulated by the fifth 
year of perestroyka in the class of party bureaucracy. No one 
predicted that the person responsible for the split would be not 
some liberal "dove" outraged by the extreme conservatism of 
First Secretary Ivan Polozkov, but one of the most brilliant 
hopes of the communist nomenklatura. 
  The new faction, which included more than 100 Russian 
communist-deputies, emerged at the most appropriate time right 
on the eve of the emergency powers which Yeltsin demanded. 
  As a result, the leader of the "democratic communists" was 
expelled from the CPSU (after 21 years of party service) "for 
actions contrary to the Rules of the CPSU and aimed at splitting 
the party and dissociation from the work of the primary party 
organization." 
  Rutskoy's wife left the CPSU one year before this, and his 
sons did not plan to join. 
  It was since then that observers closely following the 
Russian political solitaire began to get a strong opinion about 
the brilliant improvisation talent of Rutskoy the politician, 
who, essentially changing little, constantly finds himself at 
the center of interests of various forces. Many emphasize that 
there are real political structures behind the vice president: 
His People's Party of a Free Russia, 80 deputy-parliamentarians 
of patriotic factions, and also commercial structures allied 
with him, (Fund for Social Development and Revival of Russia; 
Congress of Russian Business Circles). 
  When the election campaign for president of Russia was 
launched in the spring of 1991, number one candidate Boris 
Yeltsin made an unexpected offer to Rutskoy--be nominated 
together with him as a candidate for vice president. And the 
offer was made literally on the last day set aside for this, and 
Yeltsin had not made such attempts before this. 
  It was no secret to anyone that drawing Rutskoy closer was 
the result of pragmatic calculations of an election campaign: 
The hero of Afghanistan and communist dissenter was to attract 
to the Yeltsin electorate members of the Russian Communist Party 
advocating reforms and some of the officers. At the same time, 
Yeltsin showed voters that although he is not a communist, he 
would not fight with the communists after taking office. This 
was important at that time. 
  The Yeltsin-Rutskoy tandem won the election by a large 
margin 
and on the first ballot. 
  One of the first notorious actions by Rutskoy in the new 
post 
was...a mistake. A still-inexperienced politician, but with 
military readiness for tangible actions, he got involved in a 
losing confrontation with the euphoric Chechen nationalism. 
Given the obvious illegality of the takeover by General Dudayev 
(Rutskoy said of Chechen: "This is not a revolution, this is 
banditry"), the emergency situation imposed on the territory of 
Chechen-Ingushetia, it is believed, at the vice president's 
insistence, led directly to a war which would inevitably assume 
a terrorist nature. This, naturally, was an unacceptable risk 
for the leadership of Russia. And although Rutskoy hardly 
abandoned his conviction ("A politician must be able to give it 
on the nose. Why, of course."), the afront with Chechnya, when 
President Yeltsin had to take back his decree on imposing an 
emergency situation, did quite a bit of damage to the vice 
president's political positions. According to knowledgeable 
persons, some of Rutskoy's opponents were carnivorously smiling 
at that time in the corridors of the White House! 
  It is said that Rutskoy cannot live without extreme 
situations. Maybe that is why August 1991 became a stellar time 
for him. He supervised the defense of the White House, formed 
strike detachments of Afghan veterans, and rushed to Foros 
aboard an aircraft... 
  In December 1991, Rutskoy commented favorably about creation 
of the CIS. However, judging by everything, he was quite 
skeptical about the government reforms of Yeltsin and Gaydar: 
"Another gigantic experiment which they have grown accustomed to 
conducting on Russia." His comment about young members of the 
government as "boys in pink short pants" has become well known. 
  What is more, during one of his first trips around the 
country after the start of the January reforms, he hotly 
criticized the government's course and even threatened to resign 
in Barnaul with the words: "I do not want to be the president's 
Chinese dummy," "I do not trust the boys in pink short 
pants"--i.e., Burbulis, Gaydar, and Shokhin. 
  Today, Rutskoy is outraged by what he calls anarchy instead 
of democracy: "We are now in the most petty and vulgar 
dictatorship--a dictatorship of the street and street leaders." 
  The vice president himself does not doubt his loyalty to the 
fundamental goals of the country's current leadership: He also 
favors reform, democracy, and privatization. However, he has 
again taken up a key niche in Russian politics, often stating 
that he is neither for the left nor the right. But for the 
people and for Russia ("first the fatherland, then membership in 
some or other party"), Rutskoy is able to mobilize the 
population's patriotic feelings and thus control the activeness 
of any political direction. The democrats in Boris Yeltsin's 
entourage have fought long against the committee for emergency 
situations and civil defense remaining under the vice president. 
That is probably precisely why the drawing of the vice 
president's card was the main intrigue of recent months. Judging 
from statements by the leaders of all three current oppositions 
(radical-democratic, patriotic, and communist), they tie many of 
their hopes to Rutskoy: When he spoke at the Congress of 
Civilian and Patriotic Forces of Russia in February 1992, there 
was talk in the corridors that it was the vice president who 
might become the head of some government of "national 
confidence," whose task is to reform the nation-state system and 
the economy. 
  Communist parties trying to be revived also support him. 
Their leaders state frankly that they "are with Rutskoy when he 
speaks out against liberalization of prices." What is more, as 
certain deputies and members of the Russian Federation Supreme 
Soviet claim, intensive closed consultations take place in the 
offices, apartments, and dachas of representatives of the 
top-level echelon of the military-industrial complex, the former 
CPSU, and the disbanded USSR Council of Ministers in order to 
work out a program to "pull" Russia out of the crisis situation. 
Supposedly, "representatives of Yeltsin's closest entourage, 
including Vice President Rutskoy," participate in the 
consultations. 
  However, it is most noteworthy that before calling in the 
"ministers engaged in production" into the government, President 
Boris Yeltsin needed Rutskoy very much as a person whom he 
openly called "the last legal political hope" of the 
military-industrial complex. This is especially important when, 
in the words of Academician Ryzhov, Rutskoy "as a hero and 
general can also count on the support of the Army." True, with 
representatives of the director corps coming into the government 
and an increase in the role of Arkadiy Volskiy with his Civilian 
Union, Rutskoy's influence as a semi-representative of the army 
and the military-industrial complex is decreasing. Nevertheless, 
in recent months he played an important part in the peacemaking 
process in Moldavia and South Ossetia--true, almost according to 
Lebed's recipe: First attack the corresponding republic 
leadership with statements, after which, according to historical 
experience, a declaration of war should follow; and then 
reconcile and reconcile during the course of almost intimate 
confidential consultations. But then again, such tactics have 
been successful twice... 
  Many columnists regarded as a very sympathetic step Boris 
Yeltsin's decision directing the vice president's irrepressible 
energy to advance agriculture. He was deprived of many of his 
previous powers, which Rutskoy himself talks about with 
unconcealed resentment: "When I returned from Pakistan (where he 
negotiated the exchange of Russian prisoners), I learned about 
the president's decree abolishing all my powers and 
responsibilities. All those structures which were subordinated 
to me under this decree were transferred to the jurisdiction of 
the government. The decree was signed on 19 December 1991, when 
the president was in Italy..." "I was involved in creating the 
Center for Operational Control of the Course of Reforms. I began 
setting up a tax inspectorate resembling the American system and 
dreamed about bringing order to the tax policy. I was unable to 
create a committee for protection of economic interests to 
monitor economic ties and commercial structures. I planned to 
organize state-insurance oversight. They also took away the 
committee for conversion affairs. We drew up a package of 
documents for a national guard. We were planning to reform the 
Internal Troops. That was also taken away. Yes, I still formed a 
commission for humanitarian aid and assigned a squadron of Il-76 
aircraft to it. I created a headquarters for transportation, 
shipment, and distribution. They made a mess of this, too." 
  What is more, after this quiet palace coup (which, informed 
sources believe, those same "boys in pink short pants" were 
behind), Rutskoy received several painful blows simply against 
his pride. Yeltsin moved to Old Square into the former residence 
of the Central Committee, and Rutskoy was "forgotten" on the 
fourth floor of the White House. Compiling recommendations for 
the Cabinet of Ministers, Burbulis granted the vice president 
only "the right of a consultative voice." Only after Shakhray's 
intercession was insulting wording removed. 
  Now under Article 121-7 of the Constitution, the vice 
president carries out assignments of the president. 
  In the opinion of some observers, Rutskoy today is the 
Yeltsin of 1987. Both are near the leader of a state. Both walk 
among the people and ride with them on public transportation. 
Both dislike official policy, both curse it. Then--retirement, 
adoration by the people, and...an upsurge? 
  Having instructed Rutskoy to advance agriculture, President 
Yeltsin nevertheless did not grant him specific powers. After 
waiting unsuccessfully for two months, the vice president began 
to act independently. The government created the Federal Center 
for Land and Agro-industrial Reform, undoubtedly on the vice 
president's recommendation. In addition, following the best 
traditions, he wrote a book on agrarian reform in Russia. It is 
a sizable book with a large number of tables and diagrams. 
Taking advantage of the weight of his office, Rutskoy, some 
believe, is able to pull agriculture from the present swamp 
(especially since the administrative-command mentalities are 
still quite developed here). If he does not, the skeptics 
cynically add, he "will be the first" whose political career 
"gets bogged down in a Soviet rural swamp." 
  Rutskoy's favorite pastimes are drawing and sculpture, the 
military press claims. In all the garrisons in which he has 
served, he has left a memory of himself--a canvas or a 
sculptured portrait. He keeps parrots--Fedya and Marusya--and a 
dog named Aron. He is an excellent cook. He is friends with V. 
Vinokur and Yu. Nikolayev and bosom friends with Nikita 
Mikhalkov. He drinks coffee and tomato juice. He rarely takes a 
drink--Smirnov vodka. He works long hours and sleeps four hours 
a day. 
  He was married twice. His oldest son Dmitriy is 20 years 
old, 
and his youngest Aleksandr is 18. 
<H5>  Viktor Nikolayevich Samsonov </H5>
  Someone called him the "most August" general. This nickname 
reflected, probably, the role of the chief of the Leningrad 
Garrison during the August 1991 events, when he, it seemed, one 
of the most active executors of orders of the GKChP members, did 
not lead his soldiers against the democratically oriented 
demonstrators. On 19 August, speaking over Leningrad television, 
Samsonov announced the imposition of an emergency situation in 
the city on the Neva. According to eyewitnesses, he was not to 
self-controlled at operational meetings of leaders of the State 
Administration of Internal Affairs, the Administration of the 
Committee for State Security, and military command authorities, 
and constantly demanded that force be used against the 
demonstrators who were protecting Mariinskiy Palace. It is known 
that from 19 to 21 August, Samsonov issued orders which demanded 
that his subordinate units not permit people's deputies on their 
territory. Nevertheless, the mayor of St. Petersburg, Anatoliy 
Sobchak, called the colonel-general one of the heroes of the 
putsch days. Maybe it was because the troops did not go beyond 
Gatchina, nearly mirroring the episode of 1917 when the White 
forces trying to restore lawful power were dispersed by the 
Bolsheviks and also stopped at Gatchina... 
  Former first deputy minister of defense of the USSR 
Colonel-General Viktor Nikolayevich Samsonov was born on 10 
November 1941 at the Dukhovnitskiy Sovkhoz, Dukhovnitskiy Rayon, 
Saratov Oblast. He graduated from the Far Eastern Higher 
Combined-Arms Command School in 1964 and began serving in the 
troops as commander of a maritime infantry platoon of the 
Pacific Fleet. He soon became a company commander in this same 
regiment. 
  In 1972, after graduating from the Military Academy imeni 
M.V. Frunze, he was appointed chief of staff of a motorize rifle 
regiment. Then he was commander of a motorized rifle regiment 
and chief of staff of a tank division. In 1981, he graduated 
from the Military Academy of the General Staff and was appointed 
commander of a motorized rifle division in the Transcaucasus 
Military District. 
  Subsequently, he was chief of staff of an army, commander of 
an army, and chief of staff of the Transcaucasus Military 
District. 
  In 1990, he was appointed commander of the Leningrad 
Military 
District. Here he played the most unequivocal role during the 
August putsch... 
  It is curious that the Samsonov's appointment as commander 
evoked a serious negative reaction among many deputies of the 
St. Petersburg City Soviet at that time. Thus, the council of 
the "On the LNF Platform" demanded that an emergency session of 
the Presidium of the Soviet be convened, linking the appointment 
of Samsonov to the "sharp intensification of activities by 
reactionary forces in St. Petersburg and Russia." 
  But the general rehabilitated himself by his actions during 
the coup attempt. Or they helped rehabilitate him, correctly 
understanding the correlation of forces--but this was also quite 
a bit for a person who might not have refused to carry out the 
order. As a result, he joined the leadership of the post-putsch 
armed forces as one of the most trusted generals. On 7 December, 
by order of M. Gorbachev, Samsonov was appointed chief of the 
General Staff of the USSR Armed Forces, unexpectedly replacing 
Lobov. From there he moved smoothly to the CIS Combined Armed 
Forces. 
  In general, this appointment evoked numerous objections, 
primarily by its illogical nature: It is believed that Samsonov 
knows little on the scale of all the armed forces (he never 
worked in the General Staff). His assistants also been in their 
position only two months by that time. There was even a version 
that all this was nothing more than a purely political action: 
The Belovezhskoye Agreement was signed one day after the hasty 
appointment of the new chief of the General Staff, which put an 
end to the USSR. 
  It is known that Samsonov is an advocate of a professional 
army, development of a system of measures for protection of 
servicemen, and also conduct of military reform. 
  He is married and has two children. 
<H5>  Vladimir Magomedovich Semenov </H5>
  Colonel-General Vladimir Magomedovich Semenov, commander in 
chief of the Ground Forces of Russia, was born on 8 June 1940 in 
the village of Khurzuk, Karachayevo-Cherkess Autonomous Oblast, 
Stavropol Kray. He is Ossetian by nationality. 
  He graduated from the Baku Higher Combined-Arms Command 
School in 1962. He began his service in the troops as commander 
of a motorized rifle platoon. He then was commander of a 
company. He graduated from the Military Academy imeni M.V. 
Frunze in 1970 and was appointed commander of a motorized rifle 
battalion and then chief of staff of a regiment. He was 
commander of a regiment in 1973 and chief of staff and deputy 
commander of a division in 1975. He graduated from the Military 
Academy of the General Staff of the USSR Armed Forces with 
honors in 1979. He was a commander of a division in 1979 and 
commander of an army corps in 1982. He was commander of an army 
in 1984. 
  He was first deputy commander in 1986 and commander of the 
Transbaykal Military District in 1988. On 31 August 1991, he was 
appointed deputy minister of defense of the USSR and commander 
in chief of the Ground Forces, replacing General of the Army 
V.I. Varennikov in that post. He holds a similar post in the CIS 
Combined Armed Forces. 
<H5>  Nikolay Sergeyevich Stolyarov </H5>
  In 1991, Major-General of Aviation Nikolay Stolyarov was 
appointed by USSR President Mikhail Gorbachev as assistant 
minister of defense of the USSR and chairman of the Committee 
for Work with Personnel. Actually, as informed military analysts 
believe, Marshal Shaposhnikov, then minister of defense, was 
behind Stolyarov's appointment as top "political officer" of the 
armed forces. In addition, Stolyarov is called a friend of 
Rutskoy from his flying days in the past, which also played and 
plays a pretty important role in his destiny. 
  At that time the chief of the analog of the former Main 
Political Directorate expressed his credo as such: "...I dream 
of creating a team of real professionals. Intelligent people not 
stamped by dogmas. And it would be wrong to close the search in 
a notorious circle. My principle, perhaps, is to praise a person 
for his merits and not for the lack of shortcomings." 
  Many believe that Stolyarov was able to achieve his goal: On 
a committee of 144 people, he gathered together 2 doctors of 
sciences, 25 candidates of sciences, and 6 distinguished workers 
in culture. 
  N.S. Stolyarov was born in 1947 in the village of 
Aleksandrovka, Gomel Oblast, to a working-class family. He began 
working at age 16. He graduated from the Yeysk Higher Military 
Aviation School for Pilots in 1969. He has served in Air Force 
units in command and staff positions. 
  He graduated from the Military Air Academy imeni Yu.A. 
Gagarin in 1977 and completed its post-graduate studies in 1980. 
He taught historical materialism from 1980 to 1990. He is a 
docent and candidate of philosophical sciences. 
  He has written in-depth, in the opinion of experts, research 
on M. Bakunin and other scientific works. 
  Nikolay Stolyarov has been active in political 
activities--and on the communist flank. At the 28th CPSU 
Congress, he was nominated for the post of general secretary of 
the CPSU Central Committee as one of the alternatives to M. 
Gorbachev. In September 1990, he was elected chairman of the 
Central Control Commission of the Communist Party of the RSFSR. 
In this position he was directly linked to such events as the 
expulsion of Aleksandr Rutskoy and his supporters from the 
Communist Party of the RSFSR. 
  However, he held a quite moderate stand and was known in 
democratic and also journalistic circles for his sober-minded 
thinking and liberal views. He was clearly not on track with the 
Communist Party of the RSFSR, and his break with the party 
leadership, increasingly taking the bit in its teeth, soon 
became obvious. 
  During the events in August, as it is asserted, he arrived 
at 
the White House and stood in ranks with its defenders. True, he 
said that he "was not running with an assault rifle..." But on 
the other hand, "I prepared draft documents with which the 
government of Russia appealed to the people and servicemen over 
government communications channels, and he negotiated with the 
organizers of the putsch... Sometime after our conversation, 
Yanayev himself searched for me and even tried to seek advice 
about what statement to give and how to explain himself to the 
people." 
  He flew to Foros together with Aleksandr Rutskoy: "I 
arrested 
Yazov, the former minister, with trembling hands." 
  On 29 August 1991, Nikolay Stolyarov was appointed deputy 
chairman of the USSR KGB, it is believed, at the recommendation 
of A. Rutskoy. His stay in this position remained not very 
visible. Here he dealt with questions of educational and 
personnel work. 
  Democratic figures call attention to the evolution of 
General 
Stolyarov's statements during the months following the putsch: 
From concern about democracy and its protection to fairly harsh 
statements about the need for order and strengthening the role 
of the state, including in the foreign arena. 
  In November 1991, Deputy Chairman of the USSR KGB N. 
Stolyarov said: "We are very concerned that Russia with its 
still-weak democracy does not have a strong system of law and 
order and military support of democratic gains and opportunities 
for reform. It seems to me that the path of a transition to a 
Russia of ready-made structures of the USSR KBG, including its 
central apparatus, may be quite productive. The same goes for 
the Army. ...The question is to preserve Russia as a unified 
state. No one can deny that Russia has up to the last moment 
observed the rules of gentlemanly relations with other 
republics. And they acquired independence not without the 
arbitration role of Russia. We must not give the leaders of the 
new states any more reason to thing that Russia's gentlemanship 
was dictated by its weakness. Today, it is necessary to have the 
instruments for confirming its quite sufficient strength--the 
Army, organs of security, and the Ministry of Internal Affairs." 
  January 1992: "...I state with full responsibility: We 
intend 
to the least extent to intrude into political processes, to 
dictate terms to whomever. In our totally unbalanced society, 
only a madman would try to do that. But in today's complex 
situation, we in the military do not want to be people who are 
indifferent to events which concern us above all." 
  February 1992: "The Army always was a `behind-the-scene' 
force in political processes. Now, true, everything is moving to 
the point where it may be forced to become an independent 
political force. However, whether or not it will be one will 
depend on the politicians... There are conditions under which 
the Army will be silent in political disputes--and both the 
presidents and the governments known them. Behind these 
conditions is the choice of the path over which the development 
of events will proceed... I think that the Army with its 
uneasiness, and a dangerous uneasiness, most of all serves for 
unity of the civilian society, its overcoming the syndrome of 
political aggressiveness, since the Army must not be brought to 
the point where the cannons begin to do the talking... 
  "...How zealously they are trying to prove to us that the 
breakup of the Soviet Union is an historical inevitability, that 
in its place there is only historical reality--the CIS! However, 
in society an understanding is increasingly maturing, which in 
the Army existed invariably, that the breakup of our waning, 
super-centralized, complex, but historical state is an 
anti-historical process..." 
  On 1 October 1992, Stolyarov was appointed chairman of the 
Council for Social Support of Servicemen of the Supreme Soviet 
of the Russian Federation. 
  He is married and has two children. His son is a cadet at a 
flight school for navigators, and his daughter is a student at 
the Moscow State University imeni M.V. Lomonosov. 
<H5>  Boris Vasilyevich Tarasov </H5>
  The constituent congress of the "Otchizna" movement was held 
in Moscow on 22 February 1992. General Boris Tarasov became its 
founding father. 
  In his opinion, "the movement will draw in positive people, 
people of labor who still do not consider their life to have 
been lived in vain." In his words, "the movement is against 
totalitarianism, but in favor of establishing a strong power 
based on national traditions." "We must light the torch of 
salvation for the people," said Tarasov at the conclusion of his 
speech at the congress. 
  Boris Vasilyevich Tarasov--a lieutenant-general, until 
recently a member of the Military Council, and chief of the 
Political Directorate of the Volga-Ural Military District--is 
from the ancestral lands of another well-known pro-communist 
figure, Albert Makashov, a former commander of the military 
district. 
  Tarasov was born in 1932. He graduated from the Military 
Political Academy imeni V.I. Lenin. 
  He is one of the coordinators of the parliamentary faction 
of 
Otchizna (the other coordinator is Major-General Bazarov, also 
an organizer of the movement and a confederate of the "mutinous 
retired officers"). 
  For the time being, it is difficult to determine whose 
influence is stronger in the movement, Tarasov's or Makashov's. 
However, the former colleagues, and now speaking under the same 
flag, try not to sit at the same table and support one another 
from a distance. It is difficult to say if this is a military 
tactic in the struggle for the leadership post or the spirit of 
competition. For now, General Tarasov is scoring points through 
frequent speeches, and admirers of Albert Makashov are calling 
on him to become active. 
  Recently, the parliamentary faction Otchizna has become 
noticeably more active. This is evident by the trip to 
Sevastopol, during which the retired general-deputies met with 
sailors of the Black Sea Fleet, advocating a "unified and 
indivisible" Russia. 
  In talking about Russia's borders, Tarasov constantly 
emphasizes its old borders, accusing the republic's current 
leadership of giving back all of Russia's gains in the past 
several centuries ("above all, this concerns the Russo-Turkish 
and Russo-Livon wars"). It is because of these speeches that 
Boris Tarasov enjoys success among national-patriots and 
supporters of the former union. Although today he says that 
extremism is unacceptable to him, in his words, this is 
explained primarily by the fact that the number of supporters of 
the Otchizna movement is not yet very great. But the general is 
confident that the future belongs to it. 
  In addition to Tarasov, the Coordination Council of the 
movement includes Albert Makashov and Viktor Anpilov. Otchizna's 
representation in the Russian parliament is still not 
great--eight people's deputies. According to various estimates, 
total membership in the movement is no more than 1,500. 
<H5>  Vladimir Mikhaylovich Toporov </H5>
  Colonel-General Vladimir Toporov, deputy minister of defense 
of the Russian Federation, was born on 7 February 1946 in the 
city of Baranovichi (Belorussia). He graduated from the Odessa 
Artillery School in 1968. He began service in the troops as a 
platoon commander of an antitank battery; he then commanded a 
battery in an airborne regiment. 
  In 1975, after graduating from the Military Academy imeni 
M.V. Frunze, he was appointed deputy commander of a regiment. He 
became regiment commander in 1977. In 1979, he was deputy 
commander of a division. 
  He graduated from the Military Academy of the General Staff 
in 1984 and was given command of a division. In 1987, he was 
appointed first deputy commander and in 1988 commander of an 
army. In 1989, he was chief of staff and first deputy commander 
of the Far East Military District, the same one which was once 
commanded by Dmitriy Yazov, which some observers are inclined to 
see as Toporov belonging to the Yazov "team." 
  In 1992, he was commander of the Moscow Military District. 
He 
was appointed deputy minister of defense of the Russian 
Federation by decree of the president of the Russian Federation 
dated 10 June 1992. 
<H5>  Vitaliy Georgiyevich Urazhtsev </H5>
  Lieutenant Colonel Vitaliy Urazhtsev is probably one of the 
most "scandal-ridden" figures on the Russian military-political 
scene. He is not the only one, but also his comrades in arms in 
the Union of Social Protection of Servicemen (Shchit) which he 
heads, supporters from other organizations, and simply fellow 
travelers who are united with Shchit by some need... There is an 
incident known with Major Moskovchenko, who gave a slap in the 
face to the Moscow Military Commandant Major-General Smirnov. 
Observers are reminded of the scandals at the congress of 
parents of servicemen who have died, when supporters of the 
right-protection union Shchit and the republic movement 
Soldiers' Mothers of Russia were literally thrown out of the 
hall. They also tried to remove Urazhtsev himself--from the 
All-Army Officers' Assembly, which the co-chairman of Shchit 
called "premature" and not possessing a "legal basis for 
discussing the problems of the Army and Navy." This was not seen 
by informed observers as a surprise--they had long known about 
the true hatred which the regular Army chiefs organizing that 
meeting harbored for Vitaliy Urazhtsev. 
  At the same time, the person possessing such a striking, 
scandalous notoriety was characterized (although it is difficult 
to confirm or refute this officially) by his comrades in the 
reserves as a regular industrious officer, only with an 
uncontrollable passion for fairness. That is probably why since 
childhood he was listed among the activists--back in school he 
was council chairman of a Pioneer detachment and then secretary 
of a Komsomol organization. 
  He was born in 1944 in the working-class settlement of 
Krasnaya Rechka, Khabarovsk Kray. His father was an officer in 
the Soviet Army. 
  After graduating from school, he enrolled in a theatrical 
studio and then in the Ryazan Higher Airborne Command School. He 
graduated from the journalism faculty of the Moscow State 
University and the Military Political Academy imeni V.I. Lenin. 
  In 1973, he was assigned to the Department of Komsomol Work 
of the Main Political Directorate. 
  In 1979, at the age of 35, he was assigned to the position 
of 
deputy chief of the political department of a tank division 
stationed on the territory of Poland. 
  He ended his Army career as an instructor at the prestigious 
Higher Combined-Arms Command School imeni Supreme Soviet of the 
RSFSR. 
  He was a member of the CPSU since 1964. In 1990, he was 
expelled "for demagogic statements directed at the armed forces." 
  In 1989, when the Shchit movement was created to protect 
servicemen, he was its chairman and then one of its co-chairmen. 
  Established on 29 March 1989, the Union of Social Protection 
of Servicemen, Reservists, and Members of Their Families 
(Shchit) in its best time had a membership of over 40,000 
people. This organization advocated creating a professional army 
and opposed using the armed forces in conflicts between 
nationalities. Associates of Shchit made independent 
examinations for investigation of acts of "dedovshchina" [hazing 
of new conscripts], outrages, and lawlessness in the Army 
environment and helped the Soldiers' Mothers Movement. 
  In 1990, he was elected people's deputy of the RSFSR. He is 
a 
member of the Russian Federation Supreme Soviet Committee for 
International Affairs and Foreign Economic Ties. 
  Immediately after the August putsch, his stars seemed to 
catch fire: He became chairman of the Fund for Formation of a 
National Guard of Russia. True, soon representatives of the 
president's team hastened to dissociate themselves from this 
organization, and the idea of creating a National Guard of 
Russia was up in the air, making Urazhtsev almost an impostor. 
This also became, it seems, that symbolic line behind which the 
popularity of the Shchit leader began to fall and, conversely, 
the diverse complaints against him began to increase... 
  In March 1992, his powers as co-chairman were suspended. At 
the Third Congress of the Union in April 1992, he was not 
elected to leadership bodies--and this also turned out to be the 
result of the same scandals that resulted in former comrades in 
arms of the lieutenant colonel closed the doors of his 
organization before him with wording like "he did not handle it" 
or "he did not live up to it." 
  But Urazhtsev did not become flustered and in the fall of 
that same year, with the help of strong young people from the 
"Vityaz" Center of Protection, organized another Third Congress 
of his own. Four advisers of ministers of defense and industry 
of the Russian Federation attended the congress as delegates. 
The congress approved the "course toward coming together with 
new democratic bodies of power of all levels." Only one of the 
greetings to the congress was read--from Alan Chumak. Instead of 
those who were invited but did not show up--Yeltsin, Gaydar, and 
Khasbulatov, a well-known satirist spoke--Aleksandr Ivanov, 
today a member of the Political Council of the Party of Economic 
Freedom. 
  Urazhtsev is married and has two sons, ages 19 and 6. 
<H5>  Vladimir Nikolayevich Chernavin </H5>
  Vladimir Nikolayevich Chernavin was born on 22 April 1928 in 
what is today the Ukrainian city of Nikolayev into a Russian 
family. 
  Due to his young age, he did not end up in the war, but it 
had a serious influence on his choice of his own destiny: He 
graduated from the Baku Naval Preparatory School. Then in 1951, 
he graduated from the Leningrad Higher Naval School. He joined 
the CPSU in 1949 while in school. 
  Chernavin graduated from the Naval Academy in 1965 and 
almost 
immediately entered the Military Academy of the General Staff, 
graduating from it in 1969. 
  He began his officer service as a torpedo officer on a 
submarine. He received his first independent position in 1956, 
becoming commander of a submarine. He was on ships until 1974, 
when he became chief of staff of the Northern Fleet. Then he 
became first deputy commander and in 1977 commander of the 
Northern Fleet. 
  His advancement in the service was very quick: in 1981, he 
was chief of the Main Staff of the Navy and first deputy 
commander in chief of the Navy. In 1983, he was promoted to the 
rank of admiral of the fleet. In 1985, Chernavin reached the 
high point in his military career and became commander in chief 
of the USSR Navy and deputy minister of defense. 
  According to Soviet state tradition, high positions in the 
party and representative bodies must correspond to high 
positions in employment. In 1981, he was a candidate member of 
the CPSU Central Committee; in 1986, with the "Gorbachev draft" 
he was a member of the CPSU Central Committee, which he remained 
until the very dissolution of the party. At the same time, he 
was a deputy of the USSR Supreme Soviet, 10th and 11th 
convocations. In full accordance with the same tradition, in 
March 1989 he was nominated (and then elected) as a people's 
deputy of the USSR from the "land" city of Lenkoran (Azerbaijan). 
  According to some comments, Admiral Chernavin is respected 
in 
the Navy. Not only high, according to professionals, duty 
qualities but also purely human qualities play a significant 
role here: The admiral did not equivocate when the newest 
nuclear-powered submarine Komsomolets went down in the Norwegian 
Sea together with most of its crew, but he stoically assumed the 
brunt of the blow, explaining the causes of the accident. 
  After the breakup of the USSR, Admiral of the Fleet 
Chernavin 
ended up in an ambiguous role: The USSR Navy was to cease to 
exist together with the state, but there was nowhere for the 
ships and sailors to go. The heads of the state of the CIS 
immediately declared the Navy to be common property, and 
Chernavin officially became commander in chief of the CIS Navy 
in 1991. 
  The admiral is the holder of two orders of Lenin, an Order 
of 
the October Revolution, and an Order of the Red Banner. In 1988, 
in connection with the 60th anniversary, he was awarded the 
Order of the Red Star. On 18 February 1991, by decree of Mikhail 
Gorbachev, he was conferred the title of Hero of the Soviet 
Union. 
  It is fairly difficult to talk about Vladimir Chernavin's 
political views. In the opinion of observers, he has avoided 
high-sounding statements, although in his speeches he stayed in 
the general semantic background of the speeches of top military 
leaders--with "protection of sacred boundaries," "socialist 
achievements," and so forth. He was not a dissident, but he did 
not thirst for the ideology of developed socialism. A curious 
episode occurred on 18 March 1992: The so-called "underground" 
Congress of People's Deputies of the USSR under the leadership 
of S. Umalatovaya, V. Alksnis, and others nominated Chernavin 
for the post of president of the USSR. Chernavin immediately 
stated that he had nothing to do with this congress and that no 
one had came to him with such a proposal. However, informed 
observers do not believe that this sort of "nomination" could 
have occurred in a blank space and do not rule out more or less 
innocent contacts between the admiral and "restorers" of the 
USSR. On their part, the commander in chief's obvious 
displeasure with the results of the collapse of the Union, 
especially the consequences of this for the Navy, could have 
prompted them to take such actions. 
  In September 1991, he stated that under no circumstances 
would the Baltic Fleet cease to exist, although the independence 
of the Baltic states would have a significant effect on its 
combat effectiveness. When tension arose between Ukraine and 
Russia regarding Ukraine's claims on the Black Sea Fleet, the 
admiral firmly stood on the side of the Russian leadership and 
supported the commander in chief of the Black Sea Fleet, Admiral 
Kasatonov, in his almost emphatic refusal even to discuss these 
questions. He official stated that "Ukraine's decision to take 
the Black Sea Fleet under its jurisdiction does not correspond 
to the Minsk Accords," and in April 1992 he even visited the 
17th Brigade in Sevastopol which had pledged allegiance to 
Ukraine and called upon the seamen to maintain their loyalty to 
the CIS. 
  Recently, there have been rumors that Admiral Chernavin will 
soon retire--especially after the appointment of Admiral Feliks 
Gromov commander of Russia's Navy. Again, they cite as one of 
the reasons the suspicion that the admiral still does not quite 
acknowledge the new realities. On the other hand, Chernavin 
remains commander of the CIS Navy, and no one here knows about 
the alleged decision to retire. 
<H5>  Yevgeniy Ivanovich Shaposhnikov </H5>
  He became the fourteenth and last minister of defense of the 
USSR, closing the chain of post-revolution leaders of the Soviet 
military department, among whom were Trotskiy, Voroshilov, 
Zhukov, and Ustinov. Dmitriy Yazov was the thirteenth, making up 
for his decisiveness and his bad luck in Matrosskaya Tishina 
[Sailor's Silence]. 
  Yevgeniy Ivanovich Shaposhnikov was born on 3 February 1942 
on the Bolshoy Log farmstead, Aksayskiy Rayon, Rostov Oblast, to 
a working-class family. There were four children in the family. 
His father died at the front shortly before the war ended. 
  Shaposhnikov graduated from the Kharkov Higher Military 
Aviation School in 1963. He became a CPSU member that same year. 
He served as a pilot, holding the following military positions: 
pilot, senior pilot, flight commander, deputy squadron 
commander, squadron commander... 
  In 1971, he became deputy commander and then commander of an 
air regiment. Already four years later he was deputy commander 
of a division and soon commander of a fighter division. Another 
four years later he was deputy commander of the air forces of 
the Carpathian Military District. In 1984, he was transferred to 
the same position in the Odessa Military District, where he soon 
became commander of the district air forces. In 1987, he went to 
the GDR for one year as commander of the air forces of the Group 
of Soviet Forces in Germany. 
  In 1988, he was appointed first deputy commander in chief of 
the Air Force. 
  In 1990, Shaposhnikov was commander in chief of the Air 
Force. He graduated from two academies--the Military Air Academy 
imeni Yu.A. Gagarin (in 1969) and the General Staff Academy (in 
1984). 
  He was elected a member of the Central Committee at the 28th 
CPSU Congress. 
  On 23 August 1991, Shaposhnikov, as the press attested, 
immediately stating that aviation would not help the putsch 
organizers, became USSR minister of defense. He was not in the 
position long--only until the breakup of the USSR, after which 
he was appointed commander in chief of the Combined Armed Forces 
of the CIS. According to reports of the Russian Committee for 
Defense, he turned out to be one of the few, if not the only, 
deputy minister of defense who was not tarnished by cooperation 
with the GKChP. In a certain sense, he also assisted the Crimean 
actions of Rutskoy to free the USSR president. 
  Shaposhnikov suited the democrats. In the words of General 
A. 
Tsalko (by the way, a former pilot), former deputy chairman of 
the Russian Committee for Defense Questions, Shaposhnikov is a 
"normal guy" and a "bright spot" among military men. Democrats 
are impressed, in particular, by the fact that the minister 
knows how to wear a civilian suit and an imported tie, and his 
smile is a pleasant contrast to the constantly sullen Dmitriy 
Yazov with an unhealthy face. But, of course, democrats cited 
among his credits the removal of the party from the Army and 
requests for decisive military reforms. 
  However, it was reforms that became the weak point in the 
general's positive image. "There simply are none," asserted 
Vladimir Lopatin, well-known deputy chairman of Russia's State 
Committee for Defense Questions. 
  The new minister of defense did not evoke any tearing away 
reaction among the military--he is an experienced professional, 
a servant. 
  Judging from statements in the press, Shaposhnikov does not 
demonstrate a longing for political statements, limiting himself 
to discussion of purely economic matters and social needs of 
servicemen. According to some comments, military people 
appreciate his efforts on housing construction: He promised to 
ease the apartment problem for officers in two or three years. 
Among his personal accomplishments, one can cite the fact that 
80 percent of the funds allocated to the Air Force for capital 
construction went to housing construction. He developed the 
"Zabota" [Concern] program of social assistance for servicemen. 
The marshal personally approved lists for receipt of apartments 
by subordinates. Under him, Military Transport Aviation began to 
engage in commercial transportation. True, some suspect that all 
is not so simple: malicious tongues maintain that this is done 
to legitimize free transportation of generals, their families, 
and their household goods. Shaposhnikov stated the following to 
the USSR Supreme Soviet Commission on Questions of Benefits and 
Privileges: "To prohibit something to someone was... somehow not 
very ethical." He himself did not go by any lists of privileges. 
For example, he did not have either his own or an official 
dacha. But columnists have written in this regard about an 
entire system of specific ethical "coordinates." Shaposhnikov 
confirms this opinion: "We are all children of lawlessness." 
  When he was still commander in chief of the Air Force, 
Shaposhnikov gave the impression of being a keen administrator 
and analyst of trends in development of aviation. He rather 
professionally analyzed the course of the recent Persian Gulf 
War, especially its military air aspect, although he did not 
avoid the temptation to accuse the Americans of "increasing the 
number of casualties" among the peaceful population. However, 
one must make mention that this could be the professional 
jealousy over the defeat of an army armed by the same weapons as 
his own army--especially when many pilots are complaining about 
the loss of skills due to few flying hours. 
  Shaposhnikov himself has 3000 hours of flying time and has 
mastered aircraft from the MiG-15 to the MiG-23. Even today he 
is considered fit for unrestricted flying duty. "Of course, I am 
stern," the marshal himself asserts. "I have always been very 
serious about work." And maybe that is why his career was so 
brilliant: At age 34 he was "assigned" to the position of 
division commander, and at age 37 he was a general... One of his 
colleagues in the GDR comments on Shaposhnikov's rapid rise this 
way: "He had no relatives, no fixers. He did it himself. To put 
it simply, he is a good pilot, from God." 
  Apparently another important thing is that among fliers, 
where many, speaking cautiously, do not demonstrate the miracles 
of abstention from alcohol, Shaposhnikov stood out for his 
restraint in this matter. They recall how he even organized 
"anti-alcohol courses" in one of the regiments in which he 
served. 
  On the whole, Marshal Shaposhnikov, apparently, could and 
did 
turn out to be just the long-awaited, unpoliticized professional 
in the post of minister of defense. 
  At the same time, the pro-communist so-called Standing 
Presidium of the Congress of People's Deputies of the USSR, 
chaired by S. Umalatovaya, in June 1992 decided: "For the 
collapse of the USSR Armed Forces, cowardice, and betrayal of 
the interests of the Union and its peoples, for ignoring the 
decisions of the All-Army Officer's Assembly... to relieve 
Shaposhnikov from the position of minister of defense of the 
USSR, deprive him of all military rank awarded to him by the 
supreme bodies of power of the USSR, and reduce him to the 
ranks." 
  With the breakup of the USSR, the inevitable breakup of its 
armed forces also began. The new states began snatching up 
armies and divisions like hotcakes, laying claim to their part 
of the Soviet legacy. The sphere of Marshal Shaposhnikov's 
command was also reduced with this process--especially after the 
decision to create the Russian Army based on CIS units. By 
August 1992, one year after his stellar hour, the press and 
politicians had almost forgotten about him. He remained 
commander in chief without an army... 
  But informed observers do not rule out the fact that 
considering the differences between Russia and other countries 
of the commonwealth, it is possible that Shaposhnikov may still 
become one of the key figures in the power struggle in the CIS 
Combined Armed Forces. They recall the words of Ukrainian 
President Leonid Kravchuk at a meeting of the leadership of 
Ukraine and command personnel of military units and subunits 
stationed in the republic on 11 January 1992: "I do not like the 
position of a person who says one thing today, something else 
tomorrow, and whatever he likes on Monday, depending on what 
side of the bed he got up on. Today I deeply regret the 
appointment of Marshal Shaposhnikov. But I do not have the 
opportunity to correct the mistake". (The officers and generals 
present welcomed these words with prolonged applause). 
  The marshal is married and has three children. 
<H5>  Dmitriy Timofeyevich Yazov </H5>
  He was born on 8 November 1923 in the village of Yazovo, 
Okoneshnikovskiy Rayon, Omsk Oblast. There were 11 children in 
the family. He graduated from the Moscow Infantry School imeni 
Supreme Soviet of the RSFSR in 1942, the Military Academy imeni 
M.V. Frunze in 1956, and the Military Academy of the General 
Staff in 1967. 
  He has been in the Soviet Army since 1941. He was a 
participant in the Great Patriotic War and was a platoon 
commander and deputy company commander in the Volkhov and 
Leningrad fronts. He was wounded twice and contused. He has 
written poetry since his military time, mainly lyrics. But they 
have never been published anywhere. 
  During the postwar period he was a commander of a company, 
battalion, and regiment and held various staff positions. After 
graduating from the Military Academy of the General Staff, he 
commanded a division, army corps, and army and held posts of 
first deputy commander of the Far East Military District and 
commander of the Central Group of Forces. He commanded the 
Central Asian Military District from 1980 and the Far East 
Military District from 1984. From 1987 he was chief of the Main 
Directorate of Personnel and deputy minister of defense of the 
USSR. He was minister of defense of the USSR from May 1987. 
  Everywhere he has served he has usually left for work at 
0600 
hours. 
  According to People's Deputy of Russia Urazhtsev: "Quite a 
few strong candidates sought the post of minister of defense, 
but it was Yazov who was selected... Dmitriy Timofeyevich has 
ties with Gorbachev back from working in Stavropol... Yazov at 
that time was commander of a motorized rifle corps and was part 
of the CPSU kray committee party bureau. He never `stuck out' 
and voted the way Mikhail Sergeyevich [Gorbachev] needed him to. 
Their families were friends. Mikhail Sergeyevich felt that 
Sokolov was the `wrong' man. Sokolov was being promoted by the 
previous party apparatus, with whom Gorbachev got into a 
skirmish. And Mathias Rust's landing on Red Square provided an 
opportunity to replace Sokolov with his good friend." 
  Yazov always adhered to a `harsh' policy. 
  Thus, back in December 1990, he made a joint statement with 
the leadership of the KGB and Ministry of Internal Affairs, 
which stated that in the event of attacks on military camps, 
guards would use weapons "without firing warning shots," and the 
Army in all the republics will keep garrisons "where it is 
considered necessary." 
  After meeting with Gorbachev at that time, he demanded that 
he put an end to the emerging nationalism and extremism. 
  He always believed that the Army should interfere in 
politics. Therefore, on 17 June 1991, together with Minister of 
Internal Affairs Boris Pugo and KGB Chairman Vladimir Kryuchkov, 
at a closed portion of a meeting of the USSR Supreme Soviet he 
stated the need to impose an emergency situation in order to 
stop the collapse of the country. 
  Not receiving the consent of the Supreme Soviet, on 18 
August 
he joined the GKChP. 
  On 21 August, after the return of the members of the GKChP 
from Foros from M.S. Gorbachev, he was arrested and sent 
initially to a special facility and then to the Matrosskaya 
Tishina prison. 
  However, even the "democrats" noted how "strange" Yazov 
looked among the putsch organizers. Thus, Aleksandr Yakovlev 
said: "I was surprised and insulted at the same time by the fact 
that Yazov was there." Academician Stanislav Shatalin, who was 
on the President's Council together with Dmitriy Timofeyevich 
[Yazov] and the KGB chairman, exclaimed: "Well, Kryuchkov is a 
Judas, everyone has known that for a long time, but how did the 
old man [Yazov] get into this clique?" 
  Yazov himself admits to betraying the president, but not the 
country or the motherland. One year later, by decision of Ye.K. 
Lisov, head of the investigative group, the charges of "high 
treason" were dropped. 
  He was a member of the CPSU from 1944, a candidate member of 
the CPSU Central Committee from 1981, and a member of the CPSU 
Central Committee from 1987. In June 1987, he was elected 
candidate member of the CPSU Central Committee Politburo and was 
a member of the CPSU Central Committee Politburo. 
  He is married to Emma Yevgenyevna. The romantic story of 
their acquaintance began in December 1959: They met on a train 
from Alma-Ata to Moscow listening to the train radio. They both 
had their own families at that time. The talked and parted. 
Sixteen years later, Dmitriy Timofeyevich searched for Emma 
Yevgenyevna. By that time both were unmarried. They have been 
together ever since. Both are "terrible theatergoers." The "plat 
du jour" at home is Siberian meat dumplings. 
  When Yazov was arrested, Emma Yevgenyevna was left alone, 
ill 
(she was in recovery for 56 days after an automobile accident on 
19 May 1991), without an apartment, and without a pension. Their 
property was inventoried at several thousand rubles. 
<H5>  Sergey Fedorovich Akhromeyev (Deceased) </H5>
  He was born on 5 May 1923 in the village of Vindrey, 
Torbeyevskiy Rayon, Mordovian ASSR, to a peasant family. He was 
left without a father at the age of 6 years, the victim of 
dispossession of the kulaks. He grew up on the streets of 
Moscow, leading a half-starved existence. 
  He joined the Army in 1940. He completed one course at the 
Higher Naval School imeni M.V. Frunze in 1941. He graduated from 
the Astrakhan Infantry School in 1942, the Higher Officers' 
School of Self-Propelled Artillery of the Armored and Mechanized 
Troops of the Red Army in 1945, and the Military Academy of the 
General Staff in 1967. During the Great Patriotic War, he 
participated in the fighting for Leningrad in July-December 1941 
as part of the combined rifle battalion of cadets. He was 
contused, wounded, and frostbitten several times. It was only 
thanks to the obstinacy of an old physician that they he did not 
amputate his leg. 
  He then studied at a military school and after graduation, 
from October 1942 to February 1943, he commanded a rifle platoon 
and then was adjutant in a rifle battalion, assistant chief of 
staff of a regiment, and adjutant of a tank brigade motorized 
rifle battalion. From July 1944 he commanded an assault rifle 
battalion from a self-propelled artillery brigade. During the 
war he participated in combat operations in the Leningrad, 
Stalingrad, Southern, and Fourth Ukrainian fronts. 
  After the war ended, from June 1945 he was deputy commander 
and then commander of a tank battalion. 
  From July 1953 to August 1955 he was commander of a tank 
regiment. 
  From December 1957 he was deputy commander of a motorized 
rifle division. From December 1960 he was commander of a tank 
division in the Belorusssian Military District. From April 1964 
he was commander of a training tank division. 
  After graduating from the Military Academy of the General 
Staff, he was chief of staff, first deputy commander of the Far 
East Military District. He was chief of a directorate and deputy 
chief of staff of the General Staff 1974-1979. From February 
1979 he was first deputy chief of the General Staff. In 1983, he 
was conferred the rank of Marshal of the Soviet Union and on 7 
May 1983 the title Hero of the Soviet Union. From September 1984 
to December 1988 he was chief of the General Staff, first deputy 
minister of defense of the USSR. Then he was transferred to the 
group of general inspectors and adviser to M.S. Gorbachev as 
chairman of the USSR Supreme Soviet and then as president of the 
USSR. 
  He was a CPSU member from 1943. In 1981, he was elected 
candidate member of the CPSU Central Committee at the 26th CPSU 
Congress and from 1983 was a member of the CPSU Central 
Committee. 
  He was elected deputy of the USSR Supreme Soviet (11th 
Convocation, 1984) and people's deputy of the USSR (1989). 
  He was awarded four orders of Lenin and other awards. He is 
a 
holder of the Lenin Prize (1981). 
  In the opinion of those who knew the marshal well, he was a 
soldier through and through. Sergey Fedorovich said this about 
himself: "I always have my own opinion, but I always follow 
orders." 
  As a political figure and as a person, Akhromeyev 
accumulated 
in himself the tragedy of his generation, confident in the 
righteousness of the cause to which they devoted their life and 
defending and protecting that which it was impossible to 
protect... And like the majority of people of his generation, 
during the years of perestroyka he found himself at a 
crossroads. One day you could hear him say: "We must forget that 
we are `reds' and `whites'. It is time to remember that we are 
all Russian people." Another day he would say: "I have taken the 
oath to the socialist fatherland and will that is exactly whom I 
will serve." 
  They say the same statements about the marshal's political 
biases in one of his last and few journalistic works, a book: 
"...The old is well forgotten." He penned these retorts in his 
own hand at the last minute on the page proofs of the book. 
"During the most recent days it was discovered that A.N. 
Yakovlev, a former member of the CPSU Central Committee 
Politburo and current member of the President's Council, is also 
unfriendly towards generals and admirals. After all, he was the 
one who directed the work of the mass media in 1987-1988. After 
all, this is the way the wind blows..." 
  Here is another retort not in the book: "They are trying to 
discredit both rank-and-file communists and prominent leaders. 
Now there are furious attacks on the union government and its 
head, Nikolay Ivanovich Ryzhkov, a principled and important 
worker taking the stand for a unified federative fatherland. I 
think our task is to defend the honest name of N.I. Ryzhkov and 
protect him." 
  On 24 August 1991, Akhromeyev was discovered dead in his 
office. The official version is suicide. He was buried in the 
Troyekurovskiy Cemetery in Moscow. His grave was subjected to 
looting twice, his uniform and plaster casts of awards stolen. 
  COPYRIGHT: N.I. Krotov, A.A. Tsyganov, 1992. 

